North Carolina, session 2025, HB1017.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. WELL-PREPARED, HIGH-QUALITY, AND SUPPORTED TEACHER IN
EVERY CLASSROOM

PEPSC POSITIONS
SECTION 1.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to support two additional positions for the Professional Educator
Preparation and Standards Commission (Commission) to increase the capacity of the
Commission to coordinate efforts to recruit, prepare, retain, and support the State's teaching
workforce on behalf of the State Board of Education and the Department of Public Instruction.

EDUCATOR LICENSURE AND COMPENSATION REFORM PLAN
SECTION 1.2.(a) The State Board of Education shall develop a plan for
implementing a teacher licensure and compensation reform model designed to restore respect for
the teaching profession; to build a more diverse, quality teaching force; to increase instructional
capabilities of teachers; and to entice more young professionals, mid-career professionals, and
out-of-state individuals into the teaching profession. The plan shall include at least the following
components:
(1) Offer early, inclusive, and clear pathways into the profession.
(2) Reward excellence and advancement among teachers.
(3) Encourage retention in the profession.
The State Board of Education shall submit details on the plan and any recommended
legislative changes to implement the plan to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by
March 15, 2027.
SECTION 1.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to develop the plan required by subsection (a) of this section.

EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAM CAPACITY STUDY
*H1017-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.3.(a) The State Board of Education, in consultation with The University
of North Carolina System Office, shall conduct a study to identify the resources and structures
that educator preparation programs at the constituent institutions of The University of North
Carolina need to be able to do the following:
(1) Increase capacity in educator preparation programs to recruit, prepare,
support, and graduate at least 5,000 in-State trained teachers annually.
(2) Increase capacity in educator preparation programs to recruit, prepare,
support, and graduate more educators of color annually.
The State Board of Education shall report on the findings of this study to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of
State Budget and Management by March 15, 2027.
SECTION 1.3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to conduct the study required by subsection (a) of this section.

ALTERNATIVE PATHWAYS TEACHER RECRUITMENT MODELS
SECTION 1.4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of five million eight hundred thousand dollars ($5,800,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to support research-based Grow-Your-Own and
2+2 teacher recruitment education programs in all regions of the State, including high
school-based career academy programs, the North Carolina Teacher Cadet Program, the
Teaching as a Profession program, and the TA to Teachers program.
SECTION 1.4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to establish new Grow-Your-Own and 2+2 teacher recruitment education
programs in high-need public school units.

STUDY ON CONSOLIDATING AND COORDINATING TEACHER RECRUITMENT
AND RETENTION EFFORTS
SECTION 1.5.(a) The State Board of Education shall develop a plan to implement
and fund a statewide system or entity to coordinate, enhance, and evaluate efforts to recruit, place,
and retain teacher candidates and beginning teachers between institutions of higher education
and local school administrative units. This study shall focus on, but not be limited to, how best
to consolidate and coordinate statewide teacher recruitment and retention efforts. The State Board
of Education shall submit details on the plan and any recommended legislative changes to
implement the plan to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research
Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by March 15, 2027.
SECTION 1.5.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to support the development of the plan required by this
section.

EXPAND NC TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM
SECTION 1.6.(a) Part 3 of Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes reads
as rewritten:
"Part 3. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.
"§ 116-209.60. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Commission. – The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission.
(2) Director. – The Director of the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.
(3) Forgivable loan. – A forgivable loan made under the Program.
Page 2 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Program. – The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.
(5) Public school. – An elementary or secondary school located in North Carolina
that is governed by a local board of education, charter school board of
directors, regional school board of directors, or University of North Carolina
laboratory school board of trustees.
(5a) Qualifying licensure area. – A teacher licensure area in one of the following
subjects:
a. Either of the following, as identified pursuant to G.S. 116-209.62(h):
1. Special education.
2. STEM.
b. Elementary education (K-6).
(5b) Qualifying teacher. – A teacher in a North Carolina public school who meets
the following criteria:
a. Received a forgivable loan under the Program.
b. Graduated within 10 years from an educator preparation program
leading to teacher licensure, excluding any authorized deferment for
extenuating circumstances.
c. Serves as a teacher in a qualifying licensure area.
(6) STEM. – Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.
(7) Trust Fund. – The North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program Trust Fund.
…
"§ 116-209.62. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program established; administration.
(a) Program. – There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program to be
administered by the System Office of The University of North Carolina, in conjunction with the
Authority and the Commission. The purpose of the Program is to recruit, prepare, and support
students residing in or attending institutions of higher education located in North Carolina for
preparation as highly effective teachers in qualifying licensure areas in the State's public schools.
The Program shall be used to provide a forgivable loan to individuals interested in preparing to
teach in the public schools of the State in qualifying licensure areas.State.
(b) Trust Fund. – There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program
Trust Fund to be administered by the Authority, in conjunction with the System Office of The
University of North Carolina. All funds (i) appropriated to, or otherwise received by, the Program
for forgivable loans and other Program purposes, (ii) received as repayment of forgivable loans,
and (iii) earned as interest on these funds shall be placed in the Trust Fund. The purpose of the
Trust Fund is to provide financial assistance to qualified students for completion of teacher
education and licensure programs to fill qualifying licensure areas teach in the public schools of
the State.
…
(d) Director of the Program. – The Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina shall appoint a Director of the Program. The Director shall appoint staff to the
Commission and shall be responsible for recruitment and coordination of the Program, including
proactive, aggressive, and strategic recruitment of potential recipients. Efforts shall include
identifying and encouraging students of color and students who may not otherwise consider a
career in teaching to enter the Program. Recruitment activities shall include a broad-based
strategy (i) targeting regions of the State with the highest teacher attrition rates and teacher
recruitment challenges, challenges and (ii) actively engaging with educators, business leaders,
experts in human resources, elected officials, and other community leaders throughout the State,
and (iii) attracting candidates in qualifying licensure areas to the Program. State to attract a
diverse pool of applicants. The Director shall report to the President of The University of North
Carolina. The Authority shall provide office space and clerical support staff, as necessary, to the
Director for the Program.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Student Selection Criteria for Forgivable Loans. – The Commission shall adopt
stringent standards for awarding forgivable loans based on multiple measures to ensure that only
the strongest applicants receive them, including the following:
(1) Grade point averages.
(2) Performance on relevant career and college readiness assessments.
(3) Experience, accomplishments, and other criteria demonstrating qualities
positively correlated with highly effective teachers, including excellent verbal
and communication skills.
(4) Demonstrated commitment to serve in a qualifying licensure area in North
Carolina public schools.
(f) Program Selection Criteria. – The Authority shall administer the Program in
cooperation with up to 10 institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation
programs selected by the Commission that represent a diverse selection of both postsecondary
constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and private postsecondary
institutions operating in the State. State, including minority-serving institutions. The
Commission shall adopt stringent standards for selection of the most effective educator
preparation programs, including the following:
(1) Demonstrates high rates of educator effectiveness on value-added models and
teacher evaluations, including using performance-based, subject-specific
assessment and support systems, such as edTPA or other metrics of evaluating
candidate effectiveness that have predictive validity.
(2) Demonstrates measurable impact of prior graduates on student learning,
including impact of graduates teaching in qualifying licensure areas.learning.
(3) Demonstrates high rates of graduates passing exams required for teacher
licensure.
(4) Provides curricular and co-curricular enhancements in leadership, facilitates
learning for diverse learners, and promotes community engagement,
classroom management, and reflection and assessment.
(5) Requires at least a minor concentration of study in the subject area that the
candidate may teach.
(6) Provides early and frequent internship or practical experiences, including the
opportunity for participants to perform practicums in diverse school
environments.
(7) Is approved by the State Board of Education as an educator preparation
program.
(8) For an educator preparation program enrolling loan recipients in a program of
study leading to licensure in elementary education (K-6), provides training
that is aligned with the Science of Reading in accordance with
G.S. 115C-269.20. The Commission shall contract with a third-party entity to
biennially evaluate whether a program identified in this subdivision is
providing training that is aligned with the Science of Reading.
(g) Awards of Forgivable Loans. – The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected
students to be used at up to 10 selected institutions for completion of a program leading to initial
teacher licensure as follows:
(1) North Carolina high school seniors. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to eight semesters.
(2) Students applying for transfer to a selected educator preparation program at
an institution of higher education. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to six semesters.
Page 4 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation for
teacher licensure. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per semester for up to four semesters.
(4) Students matriculating at institutions of higher education who are changing to
an approved program of study at a selected educator preparation program. –
Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester for up
to four semesters.
Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, the cost of books, and expenses related to
obtaining licensure.
(g1) Extracurricular Enhancement Activities. – The Program shall provide planning,
training, and ongoing support for Program leaders and recipients, including training on topics
such as culturally responsive teaching, teaching students with disabilities, and trauma-informed
teaching.
(h) Identification of STEM and Special Education Licensure Areas. – The Superintendent
of Public Instruction shall identify and provide to the Commission and the Authority a list of
STEM and special education licensure areas and shall annually provide to the Commission the
number of available positions in each qualifying licensure area relative to the number of current
and anticipated teachers in that area of licensure. The Commission shall make the list of STEM
and special education licensure areas readily available to applicants.
…
(j) Annual Report. – The Commission, in coordination with the Authority, the
Department of Public Instruction, and the selected educator education programs participating in
the Program shall report no later than January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee regarding the following:
(1) Forgivable loans awarded from the Trust Fund, including the following:
a. Demographic information regarding recipients.
b. Number of recipients by institution of higher education and program.
c. Information on number of recipients by anticipated qualifying
licensure area.
(2) Placement and repayment rates, including the following:
a. Number of graduates who have been employed in a qualifying
licensure area within two years of program completion.
b. Number of graduates who accepted employment at a low-performing
school identified under G.S. 115C-105.37 as part of their years of
service.
c. Number of graduates who have elected to do loan repayment and their
years of service, if any, prior to beginning loan repayment.
d. Number of graduates employed in a qualifying licensure area who
have received an overall rating of at least accomplished and have met
expected growth on applicable standards of the teacher evaluation
instrument.
e. Aggregate information on student growth and proficiency in courses
taught by graduates who have fulfilled service requirements through
employment in a qualifying licensure area.employment.
…."
SECTION 1.6.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Teaching Fellows Program Trust Fund the sum of thirty-seven million dollars ($37,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to revise and expand the NC Teaching Fellows
Program in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.6.(c) Subsection (a) of this section applies to applications for the award
of funds beginning in the 2026-2027 academic year.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

RECRUITMENT BONUS PILOT PROGRAM FOR TEACHERS IN LOW-WEALTH,
LOW-PERFORMING, OR HIGH-NEED SCHOOLS
SECTION 1.7.(a) Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall establish a grant
program to assist local school administrative units in providing multiyear recruitment bonuses to
certified teachers who commit to teach multiple years in a low-performing or high-need school.
Bonuses awarded as part of this grant program shall include, but are not limited to, the following
components:
(1) Awards over multiple years with a requirement that teachers remain in the
school over multiple years to receive the bonus.
(2) Awards to licensed teachers who commit to teach in a school identified as
low-performing, as defined in G.S. 115C-105.37, a school identified as
continually low-performing, as defined in G.S. 115C-105.37A, or a school
where seventy-five percent (75%) or greater of students qualify for free or
reduced-price lunch under the National School Lunch Program.
SECTION 1.7.(b) Request for Proposal. – By September 1, 2026, and annually
thereafter, the State Board of Education shall issue a request for proposal (RFP) for the grant
program. Local boards of education shall submit their proposals by December 1, 2026. The RFP
shall require that proposals include the following information at a minimum:
(1) Description of the proposal, including details on targeted schools for the
bonuses and how the bonus program will be structured.
(2) Evidence-based research that supports the proposal.
(3) Implementation time line for the plan.
(4) Plans for financial sustainability once grant money is no longer available.
SECTION 1.7.(c) Grant Awards. – By February 15, 2027, the State Board of
Education shall review the proposals submitted by local boards of education and select up to 10
local school administrative units for grant awards. The State Board of Education may make grant
awards for up to three years. A local school administrative unit may not receive more than five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in a single fiscal year from the grant program.
SECTION 1.7.(d) Evaluation and Reporting. – Of the funds appropriated by this
section, the State Board of Education may use up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)
to contract with an independent research organization to evaluate the impact of this grant
program. The independent research organization shall report the results of this evaluation to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office
of State Budget and Management by September 1, 2029. The Department of Public Instruction
shall report annually on the implementation of this grant program beginning March 15, 2027.
SECTION 1.7.(e) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Public Instruction the sum of seven million seven hundred thousand dollars
($7,700,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the grant program in
accordance with this section.
SECTION 1.7.(f) Carryforward. – Any unexpended funds appropriated under this
section at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall
remain available for the purposes set forth in this section.

TEACHER PREPARATION RESIDENCY PILOT GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.8.(a) Purpose. – The State Board of Education shall establish a grant
program to assist local school administrative units in the development of teacher preparation
residency pilot programs. Teacher preparation residency programs provide the necessary
preparation and induction supports to teacher preparation candidates pursuing a continuing
professional license. Teacher preparation residency programs eligible to receive grant funding
through this program shall include, at a minimum, the following components:
Page 6 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Coursework in the candidate's area of licensure.
(2) Tuition and stipends.
(3) Faculty advising.
(4) Clinical training experiences.
(5) Ongoing induction support.
Residency programs eligible for this grant program may include partnerships between
local school administrative units, educator preparation programs, local community colleges or
universities, and other community organizations. Grant funds awarded to local school
administrative units under this program shall be matched by the local school administrative units
on the basis of one dollar ($1.00) in non-grant funds for every one dollar ($1.00) in grant funds.
SECTION 1.8.(b) Request for Proposal. – By October 1, 2026, the State Board of
Education shall issue a request for proposal (RFP) for the grant program. Local boards of
education shall submit their proposals by January 15, 2027. The RFP shall require that proposals
include the following information at a minimum:
(1) Description of the proposal, including the number of teacher preparation
candidates to be served.
(2) Evidence-based research that supports the proposal.
(3) Implementation time line for the plan.
(4) Plans for financial sustainability once grant money is no longer available.
SECTION 1.8.(c) Grant Awards. – By April 15, 2027, the State Board of Education
shall review the proposals submitted by local boards of education and shall select up to 10 local
school administrative units for grant awards. The State Board of Education may make grant
awards for up to three years. A local school administrative unit may not receive more than five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in a single fiscal year from this grant program.
SECTION 1.8.(d) Evaluation and Reporting. – Of the funds appropriated by this
section, the State Board of Education may use up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)
to contract with an independent research organization to evaluate the impact of this grant
program. The independent research organization shall report the results of this evaluation to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office
of State Budget and Management by September 1, 2030. The Department of Public Instruction
shall report annually on the implementation of this grant program beginning March 15, 2027.
SECTION 1.8.(e) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Public Instruction the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the grant program in accordance with
this section.
SECTION 1.8.(f) Carryforward. – Any unexpended funds appropriated under this
section at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall
remain available for the purposes set forth in this section.

EXPAND PARTNERSHIP TEACH
SECTION 1.9. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to expand Partnership Teach to up to
two additional hub sites, including providing funds for staffing, fellowship support, mentoring,
and increasing recruitment capacity.

DEVELOPING A REPRESENTATIVE AND INCLUSIVE VISION FOR EDUCATION
(DRIVE) GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.10.(a) Purpose. – The State Board of Education, in consultation with
the Office of the Governor, The University of North Carolina System Office, and the Community
College System Office, shall establish a grant program to support strategic partnerships
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
committed to increasing the pipeline of educators of color across the State. As an extension of
the recommendations and strategies presented by the Governor's DRIVE Task Force on January
1, 2021, the grants shall be provided to local school administrative units, institutions of higher
education, and community organizations to implement innovative initiatives that support the
recruitment, preparation, support, and retention of racially, ethnically, and linguistically diverse
educators. The purpose of this program shall be to do at least the following:
(1) Increase the diversity of the educator workforce across the State through novel
recruitment efforts.
(2) Strengthen the pipeline of aspiring teachers of color across the State through
traditional and alternative certification pathways.
(3) Provide mechanisms to support and retain educators of color currently serving
in elementary and secondary public schools.
(4) Promote collaboration between school systems, institutions of higher
education, and community and nonprofit organizations to diversify the
educator workforce.
SECTION 1.10.(b) Applications. – Applicants for grants shall demonstrate at least
the following for grant award consideration:
(1) A partnership between at least two of the following entities: local school
administrative units, Historically Black Colleges and Universities,
Historically Minority-Serving Institutions, educator preparation programs,
alternative certification programs, public and private colleges and universities,
community colleges, and community or nonprofit organizations.
(2) Proposals for strategies that address one or more of the following components
of the educator development continuum as highlighted by the DRIVE Task
Force's 2021 Report to the Governor: recruitment, placement and induction,
and support and retention of educators of color.
SECTION 1.10.(c) Use of Funds. – Grant funds may be used for the following
activities:
(1) Strengthening existing high school dual enrollment programs to offer
education-based college credit or honors courses as streamlined pathways for
future careers in education.
(2) Implementing targeted school system-level and community-based recruitment
programs for aspiring educators of color interested in traditional and
alternative educator preparation programs.
(3) Utilizing and leveraging existing financial aid programs that include
scholarships, loan forgiveness, and tuition reimbursement that reduce the
disproportionate financial burden incurred by aspiring candidates of color.
(4) Increasing preparation and supporting preservice educators of color through
paid clinical learning experiences, with a commitment to teaching in North
Carolina public schools.
(5) Offering support for job placement and licensure for candidates of color after
completing their educator preparation program.
(6) Providing induction and mentoring programs that address the needs of
educators of color and that include sustaining networking and professional
learning communities or affinity groups.
(7) Encouraging and financially supporting educators of color interested in
joining national professional organizations or attending national conferences.
SECTION 1.10.(d) Request for Proposal. – By October 1, 2026, the State Board of
Education shall issue a request for proposal (RFP) for the grant program. Applicants shall submit
their proposals by December 1, 2026. The RFP shall require that proposals include the following
information at a minimum:
Page 8 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Description of the proposal.
(2) Evidence-based research that supports the proposal.
(3) An implementation time line for the plan.
(4) Plans for financial sustainability once grant money is no longer available.
SECTION 1.10.(e) Selection. – By February 1, 2027, a selection committee shall
select up to five grantees, making the effort to ensure that there is representation across the State
as reflected by rural and urban districts, institutions of higher education, and community-based
partners. Any grants awarded may be spent over a five-year period from the initial award. Grants
may be awarded for new or existing projects.
SECTION 1.10.(f) Reporting Requirements. – No later than September 1 of each
year, grant recipients shall submit to the State Board of Education an annual report for the
preceding grant year that describes the implementation of the program. This report must include
qualitative and quantitative data to demonstrate program effectiveness.
SECTION 1.10.(g) Evaluation and Reporting. – Of the funds appropriated by this
section, the State Board of Education may use up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000)
to contract with an independent research organization to evaluate the impact of this grant
program. The independent research organization shall report the results of this evaluation to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office
of State Budget and Management by September 1, 2028. The State Board of Education shall
report annually on the implementation of this grant program beginning on January 1, 2028.
SECTION 1.10.(h) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Public Instruction the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the grant program in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 1.10.(i) Carryforward. – Any unexpended funds at the end of the
2026-2027 fiscal year from the funds appropriated for the grant program under this section shall
not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes set
forth in this section.

ANNUAL EDUCATOR DIVERSITY REPORT
SECTION 1.11.(a) G.S. 115C-12(22) reads as rewritten:
"(22) Duty to Monitor the State of the Teaching and School Administration
Professions and Educator Diversity in North Carolina. – The State Board of
Education shall monitor and compile an annual report reports on the
following:
a. The state of the teaching and school administration professions in
North Carolina, as provided in G.S. 115C-289.2 and G.S. 115C-299.5.
b. Educator diversity in North Carolina, as provided in
G.S. 115C-299.7."
SECTION 1.11.(b) Article 20 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-299.7. Duty to monitor educator diversity.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Diversity categories. – Race and ethnicity.
(2) Education entity. – Any of the following:
a. A public school unit, as defined in G.S. 115C-5(7a).
b. An educator preparation program, as defined in G.S. 115C-269.1(10).
(3) Educators. – Teachers employed by a public school unit.
(4) Future educators. – Students enrolled in an educator preparation program.
(5) Grade level. – Where applicable, the grade level taught by an educator and the
grade level attended by a future educator.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Mobility rates. – The percentage of educators who move from one school or
public school unit to another.
(7) Qualitative data. – Information collected via questionnaire, interview, and
other nonquantitative methods.
(b) Education Entity Diversity Report. – No later than July 30, 2027, and annually
thereafter, each education entity shall report to the Department of Public Instruction the following
information regarding the diversity of educators and future educators in the entity from the
previous school year, disaggregated by diversity category and, where applicable, by grade level:
(1) Total number of educators and future educators.
(2) The number of persons who apply to work in or attend the education entity as
an educator or future educator.
(3) The number of educators and future educators who are employed by or
enrolled in an education entity.
(4) Retention rates of educators.
(5) Mobility rates of educators between schools in a public school unit.
(6) The number of future educators who do the following:
a. Complete an educator preparation program.
b. Become licensed in North Carolina.
c. Become employed in a public school unit.
(7) Qualitative data from educators and future educators on the diversity and
inclusiveness of the education entity, including applicable information on
recruitment, educator preparation, retention, mobility, and turnover. This
information should include related reasons for educator attrition provided on
educator workforce reports.
(8) Recommendations from the entity to improve diversity of educators and future
educators, including strategies to recruit and retain a diverse pool of educators
and future educators.
(c) Statewide Diversity Report. – No later than October 15, 2027, and annually thereafter,
the Department of Public Instruction shall collect the information provided pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section and report that information, organized to include at least the
following, to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, disaggregated by diversity
category and, where applicable, by grade level:
(1) Statewide data for each education entity, including mobility rates of educators
between public school units.
(2) Recommendations from the Department to improve diversity among
educators and future educators in education entities, including strategies to
recruit and retain a diverse pool of educators and future educators.
(d) Statistical Profile. – The Department of Public Instruction shall include the
information regarding public school units collected pursuant to this section in the statistical
profile of public schools maintained on its website.
(e) Certain Information Excluded. – Nothing in this section shall be construed to require
an education entity or the Department of Public Instruction to report any data that reveals
confidential or personally identifiable information about an educator or future educator."

ESTABLISH THE OFFICE OF EQUITY AFFAIRS WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
SECTION 1.12.(a) Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a
new Article to read:
"Article 6E.
"Office of Equity Affairs.
"§ 115C-64.35. Establishment, purpose, and duties of Office of Equity Affairs.
Page 10 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) There is established within the Department of Public Instruction the Office of Equity
Affairs. The purpose of the Office of Equity Affairs is to provide internal oversight within the
Department of Public Instruction and the State Board of Education specific to compliance with
the State's constitutional role to provide each child the opportunity to receive a sound basic
education and to direct the recruitment and retention of a diverse educator workforce.
(b) The Office of Equity Affairs shall review educational policies, programs, and
initiatives and shall provide an independent, objective source of information to be used in
evaluating substantial compliance with sound basic education standards and the goal of recruiting
and retaining a diverse educator workforce, giving special attention and consideration to
outcomes for at-risk students. The Office of Equity Affairs may suggest adjustments to the
content and delivery of educational policies, programs, and initiatives to improve their efficacy.
The authority of the Office of Equity Affairs to evaluate and advise shall extend to all policies,
programs, and initiatives related to ensuring that all students have access to a sound basic
education and to the goal of recruiting and retaining a diverse educator workforce.
(c) In carrying out its duties, the Office of Equity Affairs has authority to obtain full and
unrestricted access to all records, information, and data in the possession of or legally available
to the Department of Public Instruction or State Board of Education.
(d) Beginning no later than January 15 immediately following the effective date of this
section, and semiannually thereafter, the Office of Equity Affairs shall submit a report to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the (i) implementation of its duties as set
forth in this Article, (ii) progress of the Department of Public Instruction and the State Board of
Education in effectively providing each child the opportunity to receive a sound basic education,
and (iii) diversity of the educator workforce. Prior to the reporting of any deficiencies in progress,
the Office of Equity Affairs shall give to the Department of Public Instruction and the State Board
of Education ample notice of the deficiencies and an opportunity to correct or improve the
deficiencies and shall include in the report any efforts to do so. The report shall include any
recommended legislation.
"§ 115C-64.36. Administrative organization; organizational independence.
(a) There is established within the Department of Public Instruction the position of
Deputy Superintendent of Equity Affairs who shall serve as the chief officer of the Office of
Equity Affairs. The Deputy Superintendent shall have professional, administrative, technical, and
clerical personnel as may be necessary in carrying out the duties of the position.
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall recommend to the State Board of
Education the individual to be appointed as Deputy Superintendent of Equity Affairs, and the
recommended appointee shall be appointed upon approval by the State Board of Education. The
Deputy Superintendent shall report to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the State
Board of Education jointly and may be removed only upon the joint agreement of the
Superintendent of Public Instruction and a majority of the members of the State Board of
Education. The Deputy Superintendent shall be organizationally situated to avoid impairments
to independence of the Deputy Superintendent's professional judgment on how to best
accomplish the purposes of the Office of Equity Affairs."
SECTION 1.12.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of four hundred thousand dollars
($400,000) in recurring funds to permit the Deputy Superintendent of Equity Affairs, as
established by this section, to appoint up to four full-time staff to assist in the administration of
the Deputy Superintendent's duties under Article 6E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, as
enacted by this section. Personnel appointed to these positions shall report solely to the Deputy
Superintendent of Equity Affairs. The appointments shall not be subject to approval or
disapproval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the State Board of Education. Of the
four time-limited positions, one shall be an administrative assistant position and at least one shall
be an attorney position.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

NORTH CAROLINA NEW TEACHER SUPPORT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.13. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of forty-eight million five hundred
thousand dollars ($48,500,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the New
Teacher Support Program to provide mentoring and coaching support to beginning teachers who
are employed in public schools identified as low-performing or high-poverty at no cost to the
local school administrative units.

ADVANCED TEACHING ROLES CHANGES
SECTION 1.14.(a) G.S. 115C-310.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Class Size Flexibility. – Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-301, with the approval of the
State Board of Education, ATR schools may exceed the maximum class size requirements for
kindergarten through third grade during any term of up to three years in which State funds are
awarded to the ATR unit where the school is located. At the conclusion of the term, any class
size flexibility approved for an ATR school pursuant to this subsection shall expire.grade."
SECTION 1.14.(b) This section is effective beginning July 1, 2026, and applies
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

EDUCATOR PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT ALLOTMENT
SECTION 1.15.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, there is established the Educator
Professional Development Allotment in the State Public School Fund. The State Board of
Education shall establish the purposes for which the funds within the new Educator Professional
Development Allotment may be used, including at least the following:
(1) Educator professional development for targeted public school units and
schools requiring multitiered support for prekindergarten through grade three,
including the following:
a. Child development.
b. Early literacy.
c. Social and emotional learning.
d. Family engagement.
(2) Implementation of literacy training.
(3) Mentoring programs for beginning educators.
SECTION 1.15.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one hundred twenty-eight million four hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($128,450,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to fund the
Educator Professional Development Allotment. Funds shall be allotted to local school
administrative units based on average daily membership.

REPORT FINDINGS OF COMPENSATION STUDY
SECTION 1.16. The Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of
State Budget and Management (OSBM) by March 1, 2027, on the findings of the compensation
study it conducted on alternative teacher compensation models and advanced teaching roles using
funds awarded by OSBM from the North Carolina Evaluation Fund.

TEACHER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 1.17.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as
teachers. The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Page 12 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $5,120
1 $5,160
2 $5,200
3 $5,240
4 $5,280
5 $5,320
6 $5,360
7 $5,400
8 $5,440
9 $5,480
10 $5,520
11 $5,560
12 $5,600
13 $5,640
14 $5,680
15-24 $5,720
25+ $5,920
SECTION 1.17.(b) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule.
–
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
per month.
SECTION 1.17.(c) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Five hundred dollars ($500.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 1.17.(d) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 1.17.(e) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule
for the 2026-2027 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 1.17.(f) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.
SECTION 1.17.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of seven hundred thirty-one million
eight hundred thousand dollars ($731,800,000) in recurring funds to implement the teacher raises
provided in this section.
SECTION 1.17.(h) It is the intent of the General Assembly to adjust compensation
for teachers in the 2027-2028 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years in accordance with
information provided by the Department of Public Instruction in March of 2027 pursuant to the
compensation study referenced in Section 1.16 of this act.

FUNDS FOR NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION APPLICATION FEE
SECTION 1.18. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to provide additional grants for reimbursement of the cost of the
participation fee for National Board for Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) certification
pursuant to G.S. 115C-296.2A.

PART II. WELL-PREPARED, HIGH-QUALITY, AND SUPPORTED PRINCIPAL IN
EVERY SCHOOL

EXPANSION OF THE NORTH CAROLINA PRINCIPAL FELLOWS PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Principal Fellows Trust Fund the sum of thirteen million two hundred thousand dollars
($13,200,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to provide forgivable
loans for additional principal candidates through principal preparation programs that are provided
grants under the North Carolina Principal Fellows Program (Program) established pursuant to
Article 5C of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.

STATEWIDE SCHOOL LEADERSHIP ACADEMY
Page 14 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.2.(a) The State Board of Education shall develop a plan for the creation
of a School Leadership Academy to provide initial and ongoing support to the State's local school
administrative units and school leaders. The plan for the School Leadership Academy shall
include at least the following components:
(1) Equity training for all local school administrative units and school leaders.
(2) Training and ongoing support for local board of education members focused
on the needs of successful schools and turnaround schools.
(3) Mentorship and individualized coaching for novice principals and for
experienced principals in high-need schools focused on dismantling
impediments to student success in their schools.
(4) Peer support networks, such as facilitated partnership networks and rapid
response hotlines that provide immediate assistance.
(5) Aligned, ongoing, research-driven professional learning.
The State Board shall take into consideration any existing school administrator
leadership training opportunities when creating this plan.
SECTION 2.2.(b) By February 15, 2027, the State Board shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of
State Budget and Management on its proposal for the School Leadership Academy, including the
plan for implementation and an estimation of costs.
SECTION 2.2.(c) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the Department of
Public Instruction shall operate and support the School Leadership Academy according to the
plan developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

PRINCIPAL SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 2.3.(a) The following annual salary schedule for principals shall apply
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:
2026-2027 Principal Annual Salary Schedule
Avg. Daily Membership Base Met Growth Exceeded Growth
0-200 $84,934 $93,425 $101,920
201-400 $89,179 $98,097 $107,015
401-700 $93,425 $102,769 $112,112
701-1,000 $97,674 $107,439 $117,208
1,001-1,600 $101,920 $112,112 $122,304
1,601+ $106,165 $116,782 $127,399
A principal's placement on the salary schedule shall be determined according to the
average daily membership of the school supervised by the principal, as described in subsection
(b) of this section, and the school growth scores, calculated pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.15(c), for
each school the principal supervised in at least two of the prior three school years, as described
in subsection (c) of this section, regardless of a break in service, and provided the principal
supervised each school as a principal for at least a majority of the school year, as follows:
(1) A principal shall be paid according to the Exceeded Growth column of the
schedule if the school growth scores show the school or schools exceeded
expected growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
(2) A principal shall be paid according to the Met Growth column of the schedule
if any of the following apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools met expected
growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
b. The school growth scores show the school or schools met expected
growth in at least one of the prior three school years and exceeded
expected growth in one of the prior three school years.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The principal supervised a school in at least two of the prior three
school years that was not eligible to receive a school growth score.
(3) A principal shall be paid according to the Base column if any of the following
apply:
a. The school growth scores show the school or schools did not meet
expected growth in at least two of the prior three school years.
b. The principal has not supervised any school as a principal for a
majority of the school year in at least two of the prior three school
years.
SECTION 2.3.(b) For purposes of determining the average daily membership of a
principal's school, the allotted average daily membership for the school for the applicable school
year shall be used. For purposes of this section, the allotted average daily membership of a
principal's school shall include any prekindergarten students in membership at that school.
SECTION 2.3.(c) For purposes of determining the school growth scores for each
school the principal supervised in one or more prior school years, the following school growth
scores shall be used during the following time periods:
(1) For the first six months of the applicable fiscal year, the school growth scores
from the first, second, and third years.
(2) For the second six months of the applicable fiscal year, the school growth
scores from the second, third, and fourth years.
(3) If a principal does not have a school growth score from any of the school years
identified in this subsection, the most recent available growth scores, up to the
fourth year, shall be used.
SECTION 2.3.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to principals paid on the principal salary schedule, the amounts of
those longevity payments are included in the annual amounts under the principal salary schedule.
SECTION 2.3.(e) A principal compensated in accordance with this section for the
2026-2027 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the principal salary schedule for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) For principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant
to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the principal would have received as provided for
State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act for
the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the principal's current years of
service.
(3) For principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the salary the principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year pursuant to
Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
SECTION 2.3.(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) First year. – The school year immediately preceding the second year.
(2) Fourth year. – The school year immediately preceding the applicable school
year.
(3) Second year. – The school year immediately preceding the third year.
(4) The applicable fiscal year. – The 2026-2027 fiscal year.
(5) The applicable school year. – The 2026-2027 school year.
(6) Third year. – The school year immediately preceding the fourth year.
SECTION 2.3.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of thirty million five hundred thousand
Page 16 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
dollars ($30,500,000) in recurring funds to increase salaries for principals in accordance with this
section.
SECTION 2.3.(h) It is the intent of the General Assembly to adjust compensation
for principals in the 2027-2028 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years in accordance with any
information provided by the Department of Public Instruction in March of 2027 pursuant to the
compensation study referenced in Section 1.16 of this act.

ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL SALARIES
SECTION 2.4.(a) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, beginning July 1, 2026, assistant
principals shall receive a monthly salary based on the salary schedule for teachers who are
classified as "A" teachers plus nineteen percent (19%). An assistant principal shall be placed on
the step on the salary schedule that reflects the total number of years of experience as a certified
employee of the public schools. For purposes of this section, an administrator with a one-year
provisional assistant principal's certificate shall be considered equivalent to an assistant principal.
SECTION 2.4.(b) Assistant principals with certification based on academic
preparation at the six-year degree level shall be paid a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month and at the doctoral degree level shall be paid a salary
supplement of two hundred fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month.
SECTION 2.4.(c) Participants in an approved full-time master's in school
administration program shall receive up to a 10-month stipend during the internship period of the
master's program. The stipend shall be at the beginning salary of an assistant principal or, for a
teacher who becomes an intern, at least as much as that person would earn as a teacher on the
teacher salary schedule. The North Carolina Principal Fellows Program or the school of education
where the intern participates in a full-time master's in school administration program shall supply
the Department of Public Instruction with certification of eligible full-time interns.
SECTION 2.4.(d) Beginning with the 2017-2018 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to assistant principals on the assistant principal salary schedule, the
amounts of those longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts provided to assistant
principals pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.4.(e) An assistant principal compensated in accordance with this section
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable year.
(2) For assistant principals who were eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year, the sum of the following:
a. The salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal year
pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
b. The longevity that the assistant principal would have received as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human
Resources Act for the 2016-2017 fiscal year based on the assistant
principal's current years of service.
(3) For assistant principals who were not eligible for longevity in the 2016-2017
fiscal year, the salary the assistant principal received in the 2016-2017 fiscal
year pursuant to Section 9.1 or Section 9.2 of S.L. 2016-94.
SECTION 2.4.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of fourteen million three hundred
thousand dollars ($14,300,000) in recurring funds to increase salaries for assistant principals in
accordance with this section.
SECTION 2.4.(g) It is the intent of the General Assembly to adjust compensation
for assistant principals in the 2027-2028 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years in accordance
with any information provided by the Department of Public Instruction in March of 2027
pursuant to the compensation study referenced in Section 1.16 of this act.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PLAN FOR SCHOOL-BASED ADMINISTRATOR GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.5.(a) No later than March 15, 2027, the State Board of Education shall
develop and report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division a plan to implement and evaluate the effectiveness of incentive programs to
encourage well-qualified principals and assistant principals to work in high-need schools. These
programs may include salary supplements for principals who take positions in chronically
low-performing schools, protection for principals against salary reduction for working in
high-need or low-performing schools, and rewards for principals and assistant principals for
making progress on school performance.
SECTION 2.5.(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement advisable
components of the plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.5.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in
nonrecurring funds to develop and report the plan described in subsection (a) of this section.

RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ADDITIONAL AUTONOMY AND RESOURCES FOR
PRINCIPALS AND SUPERINTENDENTS IN LOCAL SCHOOL ADMINISTRATIVE
UNITS
SECTION 2.6.(a) No later than November 15, 2027, the Department of Public
Instruction shall survey local school administrative units on recommendations to increase
autonomy and resources for principals and superintendents. No later than February 15, 2028, the
Department shall compile responses from this survey and report them to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 2.6.(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement advisable
recommendations submitted to the Department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section in the
2028-2029 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

PART III. FINANCE SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES ADEQUATE, EQUITABLE, AND
EFFICIENT RESOURCES

BUDGET FLEXIBILITY FOR LOCAL BOARDS OF EDUCATION
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 115C-105.25(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Subject to the following limitations, local boards of education may transfer and may
approve transfers of funds between funding allotment categories:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.14, effective July 1, 2013.
(1a) Funds for career and technical education and other purposes may be
transferred only as permitted by federal law and the conditions of federal
grants or as provided through any rules that the State Board of Education
adopts to ensure compliance with federal regulations.
(1b) No funds shall be transferred out of the children with disabilities allotment
category.
(2), (2a) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.14, effective July 1, 2013.
(3) No funds shall be transferred into the central office administration allotment
category.
(3a) No funds shall be transferred out of the teacher assistants allotment category.
(3b) No funds shall be transferred out of the academically or intellectually gifted
children allotment category.
(4), (5) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.14, effective July 1, 2013.
(5a) No positions shall be transferred out of the allocation for classroom teachers
for kindergarten through twelfth grade, except as provided in this subdivision.
Page 18 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Positions allocated for classroom teachers may be converted to dollar
equivalents to contract for visiting international exchange teachers through a
visiting international exchange teacher program approved by the State. These
positions shall be converted at the statewide average salary for classroom
teachers, including benefits. The converted funds shall be used only to provide
visiting international exchange teachers with salaries commensurate with their
experience levels, to provide any State-approved bonuses, and to cover the
costs associated with supporting visiting international exchange teachers
within the local school administrative unit, including programming and
related activities, background checks, medical coverage, and other program
administration services in accordance with the federal regulations for the
Exchange Visitor Program, 22 C.F.R. Part 62.
(5b) Positions allocated Except as provided in subdivision (5a) of this subsection,
positions allocated for classroom teachers and for instructional support
personnel may be converted to dollar equivalents for any purpose authorized
by the policies of the State Board of Education. These positions shall be
converted at the salary on the first step of the "A" Teachers Salary Schedule.
Certified position allotments shall not be transferred to dollars to hire the same
type of position.
(5c) Funds allocated for school building administration may be converted for any
purpose authorized by the policies of the State Board of Education. For funds
related to principal positions, the salary transferred shall be based on the first
step of the Base column of the Principal Salary Schedule. For funds related to
assistant principal months of employment, the salary transferred shall be based
on the first step of the "A" Teachers Salary Schedule at the salary level for
assistant principals. Certified position allotments shall not be transferred to
dollars to hire the same type of position.
(5d) No positions shall be transferred out of the allocation for program
enhancement teachers for kindergarten through fifth grade except as provided
in this subdivision. Positions allocated for program enhancement teachers for
kindergarten through fifth grade may be converted into positions allocated for
classroom teachers for kindergarten through twelfth grade. For the purposes
of this subdivision, the term "program enhancement" is as defined in
G.S. 115C-301(c2).
(6) through (9) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 8.14, effective July 1,
2013.
(10) Funds to carry out the elements of the Excellent Public Schools Act that are
contained in Section 7A.1 of S.L. 2012-142 shall not be transferred.
(10a) No funds shall be transferred out of the limited English proficiency allotment
category.
(11) No funds shall be transferred into or out of the driver education allotment
category.
(12) Funds allotted for textbooks and digital resources may only be used for the
purchase of textbooks and digital resources. These funds shall not be
transferred out of the allotment for any other purpose.
(13) No positions shall be transferred out of the allocation for school health
personnel except as provided in this subdivision. Positions allocated for school
health personnel may be converted to dollar equivalents for contracted
services directly related to school psychology, school counseling, school
nursing, and school social work. These positions shall be converted at the
minimum salary for the position on the "A" Teachers Salary Schedule."
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.1.(b) This section applies beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

FUNDS FOR CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES
SECTION 3.2.(a) G.S. 115C-111.05 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-111.05. Funding for children with disabilities.
To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board shall allocate funds
for children with disabilities to each local school administrative unit on a per child basis. Each
local school administrative unit shall receive funds for the lesser of (i) all children who are
identified as children with disabilities or (ii) thirteen percent (13%) of its allocated average daily
membership in the local school administrative unit for the current school year.on the basis of the
reported cost of the services provided."
SECTION 3.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of four hundred fifty million three hundred twenty-four thousand
two hundred seventy-three dollars ($450,324,273) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to implement the plan for weighted funding for children with disabilities on the basis of the
reported cost of services provided developed by the Department of Public Instruction pursuant
to Section 7.7 of S.L. 2023-134. The Department shall begin distributing funds for children with
disabilities based on this model beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

REVISE SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING IN LOW-WEALTH COUNTIES
SECTION 3.3.(a) Subsections (d) and (e) of G.S. 115C-472.22 read as rewritten:
"(d) Allocation of Funds. – Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the amount
received per average daily membership for a county shall be the difference between one hundred
ten percent (110%) of the State average current expense appropriations per student and the
current expense appropriations per student that the county could provide given the county's
wealth and an average effort to fund public schools. To derive the current expense appropriations
per student that the county could be able to provide given the county's wealth and an average
effort to fund public schools, multiply the county's wealth as a percentage of State average wealth
by the State average current expense appropriations per student. The funds for the local school
administrative units located in whole or in part in the county shall be allocated to each local
school administrative unit located in whole or in part in the county based on the average daily
membership of the county's students in the school units. If the funds appropriated for
supplemental funding are not adequate to fund the formula fully, each local school administrative
unit shall receive a pro rata share of the funds appropriated for supplemental funding.
(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to This Section Only. –
The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental funding for
low-wealth counties and is not intended to reflect any measure of the adequacy of the educational
program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not intended to reflect any
commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional supplemental funds for low-
wealth counties.counties. It is the intent of the General Assembly to incrementally increase
appropriations for the low-wealth allotment to provide eligible counties supplemental funding
equal to one hundred ten percent (110%) of the statewide local revenue per student by fiscal year
2027-2028. The State Board of Education shall adjust the formula to ensure each local school
administrative unit receives a pro rata share of the additional funds appropriated for the
low-wealth allotment in this section for supplemental funding."
SECTION 3.3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one hundred fifty-four million one hundred thousand dollars
($154,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the changes to the
low-wealth allotment enacted by this section.

FUNDING FOR LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY STUDENTS
Page 20 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.4.(a) The title of Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Supplemental School Funding.Funding and Other Allotments."
SECTION 3.4.(b) Article 32F of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-472.30. Limited English proficient allotment.
(a) To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, the State Board of Education
shall allocate funds to local school administrative units, charter schools, regional schools, and
laboratory schools operated under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes to provide
services to students with limited English proficiency. The State Board shall allocate these funds
under a formula that is based on the average number of students in the units, charter schools,
regional schools, or laboratory schools over the past three years who have limited English
proficiency.
(b) Local school administrative units shall use funds allocated to them to pay for
classroom teachers, teacher assistants, tutors, instructional materials, transportation costs, and
professional development of teachers for students with limited English proficiency.
(c) A county in which a local school administrative unit receives funds under this section
shall use the funds to supplement local current expense funds and shall not supplant local current
expense funds."
SECTION 3.4.(c) Subsection (a) of Section 7.9 of S.L. 2007-323 is repealed.
SECTION 3.4.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one hundred eighty-one million dollars ($181,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the requirements of this section.

TEACHER ASSISTANT ALLOTMENT
SECTION 3.5.(a) Section 8.47(b) of S.L. 2015-241 is repealed.
SECTION 3.5.(b) Article 21 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-316.6. Teacher assistant allotment.
(a) To the extent funds are made available, the State Board of Education shall establish a
funding allotment for teacher assistant positions. The State Board is authorized to adopt rules for
the allocation of teacher assistant positions pursuant to this allotment. Funds allocated pursuant
to this section shall be distributed based on the following:
(1) An estimated statewide average salary and benefits per teacher assistant
position.
(2) The requirements of subsection (d) of this section.
(b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Public Instruction for the following fiscal years the following amounts
to the teacher assistant allotment:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2026-2027 $201,500,000
2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter $280,300,000
(c) When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in subsection (b) of this section, the Director of the Budget shall include the
appropriated amount for that fiscal year.
(d) Funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated to local
school administrative units to increase positions for teacher assistants in the following fiscal years
to the following statewide ratios of teacher assistants to students in kindergarten through grade
three:
Fiscal Year Teacher Assistants
2026-2027 1:30
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter 1:27."

INCREASE FUNDING FOR INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PERSONNEL
SECTION 3.6.(a) G.S. 115C-316.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-316.5. School health personnel allotment.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "school health personnel" refers to the same
positions listed in G.S. 115C-316.2(a).
(b) To the extent funds are made available, the The State Board of Education shall
establish a funding allotment for school health personnel positions. There is appropriated from
the General Fund to the Department of Public Instruction to fund the allotment the following
amounts in the fiscal years identified:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2026-2027 $614,800,000
2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter $796,600,000
(b1) When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in subsection (b) of this section, the Director of the Budget shall include the
appropriated amount for that fiscal year.
(b2) The State Board is authorized to shall adopt rules for the allocation of school health
personnel positions pursuant to this allotment. Rules adopted by the State Board pursuant to this
section shall include, at a minimum, the following requirements:
(1) School health personnel positions are allocated on the basis of average daily
membership.
(2) Each local school administrative unit receives sufficient funding for at least
one school psychologist position.to fulfill the position-to-student ratios
identified in subsection (c) of this section.
(3) Local school administrative units are encouraged to fill positions under this
allotment with full-time, permanent employees. If the local school
administrative unit is unable to fill these positions by hiring a full-time,
permanent employee, the allocation for the position may be converted to a
dollar equivalent for the unit to contract with a third party to provide the
relevant services for an amount of hours equivalent to the hours a full-time
position employee would provide.
(c) Local school administrative units shall increase school health personnel positions
each fiscal year until the 2028-2029 fiscal year at the following position-to-student ratios:
Fiscal Year Nurses Counselors Social Workers Psychologists
2026-2027 1:657 1:275 1:496 1:885
2027-2028
and each subsequent
fiscal year thereafter 1:574 1:250 1:400 1:700."
SECTION 3.6.(b) Article 21 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-316.7. Instructional support allotment.
(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Public Instruction for the following fiscal years the following amounts
to the instructional support allotment:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
2026-2027 $49,400,000
2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter $73,400,000
(b) When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in subsection (a) of this section, the Director of the Budget shall include the
appropriated amount for that fiscal year.
Page 22 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be allocated to local
school administrative units to increase instructional support personnel positions each fiscal year
until the 2028-2029 fiscal year at the following position-to-student ratios:
Fiscal Year Media Coordinators
2026-2027 1:608
2027-2028 and each subsequent fiscal year thereafter 1:547."

CONSOLIDATE ALLOTMENTS INTO A SINGLE ALLOTMENT
SECTION 3.7. The Department of Public Instruction shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on a method to combine all dollar allotments
currently distributed on the basis of average daily membership into a single allotment. The
Department shall submit the report no later than February 15, 2027.

INCREASE ALLOTTED ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL MONTHS OF EMPLOYMENT
SECTION 3.8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the recurring sum of twenty-four million eight hundred thousand dollars
($24,800,000) in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the school building administration
allotment. These funds shall be used to increase the ratio of assistant principals to students in all
local school administrative units.

INCREASE FUNDING FOR CENTRAL OFFICE STAFF
SECTION 3.9. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the recurring sum of twenty-nine million three hundred fifty-five thousand
three hundred fifty-five dollars ($29,355,355) in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the central
office administration allotment. These funds shall be used to support additional personnel and
services provided by central office staff in local school administrative units.

CENTRAL OFFICE SALARIES
SECTION 3.10.(a) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to assistant
superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance
officers for the 2026-2027 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:
2026-2027 Fiscal Year
Maximum
School Administrator I $7,800
School Administrator II $8,265
School Administrator III $8,757
School Administrator IV $9,099
School Administrator V $9,463
School Administrator VI $10,023
School Administrator VII $10,424
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for each assistant superintendent, associate superintendent, director/coordinator, supervisor, or
finance officer within the maximums and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly
for central office administrators and superintendents. The category in which an employee is
placed shall be included in the contract of any employee.
SECTION 3.10.(b) The monthly salary maximums that follow apply to
superintendents for the 2026-2027 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:
2026-2027 Fiscal Year
Maximum
Superintendent I $11,049
Superintendent II $11,707
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Superintendent III $12,410
Superintendent IV $13,156
Superintendent V $13,947
The local board of education shall determine the appropriate category and placement
for the superintendent based on the average daily membership of the local school administrative
unit and within funds appropriated by the General Assembly for central office administrators and
superintendents.
SECTION 3.10.(c) Longevity pay for superintendents, assistant superintendents,
associate superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers shall be as
provided for State employees under the North Carolina Human Resources Act.
SECTION 3.10.(d) Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate
superintendents, directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based
on academic preparation at the six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one
hundred twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided
pursuant to this section. Superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents,
directors/coordinators, supervisors, and finance officers with certification based on academic
preparation at the doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the compensation provided for under this
section.
SECTION 3.10.(e) The State Board of Education shall not permit local school
administrative units to transfer State funds from other funding categories for salaries for public
school central office administrators.

ESTABLISH MECHANISM TO CONTINUALLY UPDATE STATE SPENDING FOR
INFLATION AND ENROLLMENT GROWTH
SECTION 3.11. The Department of Public Instruction, when submitting budget
adjustment requests to the General Assembly and the Office of State Budget and Management,
shall include adjustments for inflation and other rising costs associated with providing a sound
basic education.

APPROPRIATE FUNDS DIRECTLY TO CHARTER SCHOOLS
SECTION 3.12.(a) G.S. 115C-218.105 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.105. State and local funds for a charter school.
(a) The State Board of Education shall allocate to each charter school:
(1) An amount equal to the average per pupil allocation for average daily
membership from the local school administrative unit allotments for the local
school administrative unit in which the charter school is located for each child
attending the charter school except for the allocation for children with
disabilities and for the allocation for children with limited English
proficiency;school.
(2) An additional amount for each child attending the charter school who is a child
with disabilities; anddisabilities.
(3) An additional amount for children with limited English proficiency attending
the charter school, based on a formula adopted by the State Board.
In accordance with G.S. 115C-218.7 and G.S. 115C-218.8, the State Board shall allow for
annual adjustments to the amount allocated to a charter school based on its enrollment growth in
school years subsequent to the initial year of operation.
In the event a child with disabilities leaves the charter school and enrolls in a public school
during the first 60 school days in the school year, the charter school shall return a pro rata amount
of funds allocated for that child to the State Board, and the State Board shall reallocate those
funds to the local school administrative unit in which the public school is located. In the event a
Page 24 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
child with disabilities enrolls in a charter school during the first 60 school days in the school year,
the State Board shall allocate to the charter school the pro rata amount of additional funds for
children with disabilities.
…
(b1) Counties may provide direct capital funds to charter schools by direct appropriation
as set forth in G.S. 153A-461. These funds shall be used only for the following purposes:
…
(b2) If a charter school uses funds provided in receives direct capital funds under
subsection (b1) of this section to acquire or improve property, the amount provided by the county
shall be evidenced by a promissory note and secured by a deed of trust on the property acquired
or improved by the funds. The county may subordinate the deed of trust to other liens to facilitate
the acquisition or improvement of the property secured by the deed of trust. In the event that a
charter school repays the county in the amount of the capital funds provided, the county shall,
for the property acquired or improved by the funds, execute and file a deed of release or other
documentation of satisfaction showing the charter school repaid the county in the amount of the
capital funds provided.
(b3) For each child attending a charter school, the county in which the child resides shall
allocate to the charter school an amount equal to the average per pupil allocation for average
daily membership, as determined in accordance with G.S. 115C-430.
(b4) Counties shall allocate funds to charter schools in accordance with G.S. 115C-437.
…."
SECTION 3.12.(b) G.S. 115C-218.105(c) through G.S. 115C-218.105(e) are
repealed.
SECTION 3.12.(c) G.S. 115C-423 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-423. Definitions.
The words and phrases defined in this section have the meanings indicated when used in this
Article, unless the context clearly requires another meaning:
(1) "Budget" is a Budget. – A plan proposed by a board of education for raising
and spending money for specified school programs, functions, activities, or
objectives during a fiscal year.
(2) "Budget resolution" is a Budget resolution. – A resolution adopted by a board
of education that appropriates revenues for specified school programs,
functions, activities, or objectives during a fiscal year.
(3) "Budget year" is the Budget year. – The fiscal year for which a budget is
proposed and a budget resolution is adopted.
(4) "Fiscal year" is the Fiscal year. – The annual period for the compilation of
fiscal operations. The fiscal year begins on July 1 and ends on June 30.
(5) "Fund" is an Fund. – An independent fiscal and accounting entity consisting
of cash and other resources together with all related liabilities, obligations,
reserves, and equities which are segregated by appropriate accounting
techniques for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain
objectives in accordance with established legal regulations, restrictions or
limitations.
(6) "Vending facilities" has the same meaning as it does in Local schools. – All
local school administrative units located in a county, plus any charter schools
that are attended by children residing in the county.
(7) Vending facilities. – As defined in G.S. 111-42(d), but also means any
mechanical or electronic device dispensing items or something of value or
entertainment or services for a fee, regardless of the method of activation, and
regardless of the means of payment, whether by coin, currency, tokens, or
other means."
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 25

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.12.(d) G.S. 115C-430 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-430. Apportionment of county appropriations among local school administrative
units.schools.
If there is more than one local school administrative unit in a county, all All appropriations
by the county to the local current expense funds of the units, schools, except appropriations
funded by supplemental taxes levied less than countywide pursuant to a local act of
G.S. 115C-501 to 115C-511, must be apportioned according to the membership of each unit.
average daily membership. County appropriations are properly apportioned when the dollar
amount obtained by dividing the amount so appropriated to each unit appropriated to each local
school administrative unit in the county and each charter school a resident child is attending by
the total membership of the unit or number of resident charter school attendees is the same for
each unit. The total membership of the local school administrative unit is the unit's average same.
Average daily membership for the budget year to shall be determined by and certified to the unit
local schools and the board of county commissioners by the State Board of Education."
SECTION 3.12.(e) G.S. 115C-431 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-431. Procedure for resolution of dispute between board of education the governing
body of a local school and a board of county commissioners.
(a) If the board of education governing body of a local school determines that the amount
of money appropriated to the local current expense fund, or the capital outlay fund, or both, by
the board of county commissioners to a local school administrative unit or charter school is not
sufficient to support a system of free public schools, then the chairman of the board of education
governing body of the local school and the chairman of the board of county commissioners shall
arrange a joint meeting of the two boards to be held within seven days after the day of the county
commissioners' decision on the school appropriations.
Prior to the joint meeting, the Senior Resident Superior Court Judge shall appoint a mediator
unless the boards agree to jointly select a mediator. The mediator shall preside at the joint meeting
and shall act as a neutral facilitator of disclosures of factual information, statements of positions
and contentions, and efforts to negotiate an agreement settling the boards' differences.
At the joint meeting, the entire school budget shall be considered carefully and judiciously,
and the two boards shall make a good-faith attempt to resolve the differences that have arisen
between them.
(b) If no agreement is reached at the joint meeting of the two boards, the mediator shall,
at the request of either board, commence a mediation immediately or within a reasonable period
of time. The mediation shall be held in accordance with rules and standards of conduct adopted
under Chapter 7A of the General Statutes governing mediated settlement conferences but
modified as appropriate and suitable to the resolution of the particular issues in disagreement.
Unless otherwise agreed upon by both boards, the following individuals shall constitute the
two working groups empowered to represent their respective boards during the mediation:
(1) The chair of each board or the chair's designee;designee.
(2) The superintendent of the local school administrative unit or the chairman of
the charter school board of directors, and the county manager manager, or
either's designee;any of their designees.
(3) The finance officer of each board; andboard.
(4) The attorney for each board.
Members of both the boards, their chairs, and representatives shall cooperate with and respond
to all reasonable requests of the mediator to participate in the mediation. Notwithstanding Article
33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the mediation proceedings involving the two working
groups shall be conducted in private. Evidence of statements made and conduct occurring in a
mediation are not subject to discovery and are inadmissible in any court action. However, no
evidence otherwise discoverable is inadmissible merely because it is presented or discussed in a
mediation. The mediator shall not be compelled to testify or produce evidence concerning
Page 26 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
statements made and conduct occurring in a mediation in any civil proceeding for any purpose,
except disciplinary hearings before the State Bar or any agency established to enforce standards
of conduct for mediators. Reports by members of either working group to their respective boards
shall be made in compliance with Article 33C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
Unless both boards agree otherwise, or unless the boards have already resolved their dispute,
the mediation shall end no later than August 1. The mediator shall have the authority to determine
that an impasse exists and to discontinue the mediation. The mediation may continue beyond
August 1 provided both boards agree. If both boards agree to continue the mediation beyond
August 1, the board of county commissioners shall appropriate to the local school administrative
unit for deposit in the local current expense fund or to a charter school a sum of money sufficient
to equal the local contribution to this fund for the previous year.
If the working groups reach a proposed agreement, the terms and conditions must be
approved by each board. If no agreement is reached, the mediator shall announce that fact to the
chairs of both boards, the Senior Resident Superior Court Judge, and the public. The mediator
shall not disclose any other information about the mediation. The mediator shall not make any
recommendations or public statement of findings or conclusions.
The local board of education governing body of the local school and the board of county
commissioners shall share equally the mediator's compensation and expenses. The mediator's
compensation shall be determined according to rules adopted under Chapter 7A of the General
Statutes.
(b1) If agreement is not reached in mediation on the amount of money appropriated to the
local current expense fund, fund or charter school, and the amount to be appropriated has not
been calculated pursuant to this subsection for longer than the prior year, the sum to be
appropriated for the budget year in dispute shall be calculated as follows:
(1) The amount of moneys appropriated to the local current expense fund by the
board of county commissioners in the prior fiscal year that are expended in
that year by the local school administrative unit or transferred as required by
G.S. 115C-75.10, 115C-218.105, 115C-238.70, and 116-239.11 shall be
divided by the sum of the following: the average daily membership of the local
school administrative unit plus the share of the average daily membership of
any innovative, charter, regional, or laboratory school whose students reside
in the local school administrative unit for the prior school year. For charter
schools, the amount of moneys appropriated to the charter school in the prior
fiscal year that are expended in that year divided by the average daily
membership of the charter school.
(2) The amount from subdivision (1) of this subsection, rounded to the nearest
penny, shall then be multiplied by the sum of one plus the twelve month
percent change in the second quarter Employment Cost Index for elementary
and secondary school workers as reported by the Federal Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
(3) The amount from subdivision (2) of this subsection, rounded to the nearest
penny, shall then be multiplied by the sum of the following: the allotted
average daily membership for the school year plus the share of the average
daily membership of any innovative, charter, regional, or laboratory school
whose students reside in the local school administrative unit for the budget
year in dispute. For charter schools, the amount shall be multiplied by the
allotted average daily membership for the school year.
The board of county commissioners shall appropriate to the local current expense fund or the
charter school the sum from subdivision (3) of this subsection, rounded to the nearest penny, to
the local board of education for the budget year in dispute.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 27

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b2) If agreement is not reached in mediation, and the amount to be appropriated has been
calculated pursuant to subsection (b1) of this section to the local current expense fund for the
prior two years, the sum to be appropriated for the budget year in dispute shall be calculated as
follows:
(1) The amount of moneys appropriated to the local current expense fund by the
board of county commissioners in the prior fiscal year that are expended in
the prior fiscal year by the local school administrative unit and transferred as
required by G.S. 115C-75.10, 115C-218.105, 115C-238.70, and 116-239.11
shall be divided by the sum of the following: the average daily membership
plus the share of the average daily membership of any innovative, charter,
regional, or laboratory school whose students reside in the local school
administrative unit for the prior school year. For charter schools, the amount
of moneys appropriated to the charter school in the prior fiscal year that are
expended in that year divided by the average daily membership of the charter
school.
…
(4) The amount from subdivision (3) of this subsection shall then be multiplied
by the sum of the following: the allotted average daily membership for the
school year plus the share of the average daily membership of any innovative,
charter, regional, or laboratory school whose students reside in the local
school administrative unit for the budget year in dispute. For charter schools,
the amount shall be multiplied by the funded average daily membership for
the school year.
The board of county commissioners shall appropriate to the local current expense fund or to
the charter school the sum from subdivision (4) of this subsection, rounded to the nearest penny,
to the local board of education for the budget year in dispute.
(b3) Neither the local board of education governing body of the local school nor the board
of county commissioners shall file any legal action challenging the determination as to the funds
to be appropriated by the board of county commissioners to the local current expense fund in
accordance with under the formulas found in subsections (b1) and (b2) of this section.
…."
SECTION 3.12.(f) G.S. 115C-437 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-437. Allocation of revenues to the local school administrative unit by the
county.schools.
Revenues accruing to the local school administrative unit schools by virtue of Article IX,
Sec. 7, of the Constitution and taxes levied by or on behalf of the a local school administrative
unit pursuant to a local act or G.S. 115C-501 to 115C-511 shall be remitted to the school finance
officer by the officer having custody thereof within 10 days after the close of the calendar month
in which the revenues were received or collected. The clear proceeds of all penalties and
forfeitures and of all fines collected for any breach of the penal laws of the State, as referred to
in Article IX, Sec. 7 of the Constitution, shall include the full amount of all penalties, forfeitures
or fines collected under authority conferred by the State, diminished only by the actual costs of
collection, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the amount collected. Revenues appropriated to
the local school administrative unit a local school by the board of county commissioners from
general county revenues shall be made available to the school finance officer by such procedures
as may be mutually agreeable to the board of education governing body of the local school and
the board of county commissioners, but if no such agreement is reached, these funds shall be
remitted to the school finance officer by the county finance officer in monthly installments
sufficient to meet its lawful expenditures from the county appropriation until the county
appropriation to the local school administrative unit is exhausted. Each installment shall be paid
not later than 10 days after the close of each calendar month. When revenue has been appropriated
Page 28 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the local school administrative unit by the board of county commissioners from funds which
carry specific restrictions binding upon the county as recipient, the board of commissioners must
inform the local school administrative unit in writing of those restrictions."
SECTION 3.12.(g) G.S. 115C-448(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Special funds of individual schools shall not be included as part of the local current
expense fund of a local school administrative unit for the purposes of determining in determining
the per pupil share of the local current expense fund transferred amount to be appropriated from
the county to a charter school pursuant to G.S. 115C-218.105(c).G.S. 115C-218.105(b3)."
SECTION 3.12.(h) G.S. 153A-461 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-461. Charter schools.
(a) Each county shall appropriate to a charter school the average per pupil allocation, as
determined by G.S. 115C-430, for each child that resides in the county and attends that charter
school.
(b) Each county is authorized to appropriate direct capital funds and lease real property
to schools chartered under Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes. Counties may
provide direct capital funds only for the purposes set forth in G.S. 115C-218.105(b1)."

ISSUE CAPITAL BONDS
SECTION 3.13.(a) Purpose. – It is the intent of the General Assembly by this section
to provide, subject to a vote of the qualified voters of the State, for the issuance of four billion
dollars ($4,000,000,000) general obligation bonds of the State for the purpose of providing funds,
with any other available funds, for public school facilities through grants to counties for public
school capital outlay projects, repairs, and renovations.
SECTION 3.13.(b) Definitions. – Unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Bonds. – Bonds issued under this section.
(2) Cost. – Without intending thereby to limit or restrict any proper definition of
this term in financing the cost of any capital outlay projects as authorized by
this section, any of the following:
a. The cost of constructing, reconstructing, enlarging, acquiring, and
improving projects and acquiring equipment and land therefor.
b. The cost of engineering, architectural, and other consulting services as
may be required.
c. Administrative expenses and charges, including expenses related to
determining compliance with applicable requirements of federal law
and expenses relating to issuance. Nothing in this section shall permit
use of bond funds to pay salaries or fees for bond administration; such
salaries and fees shall come from funds appropriated by the General
Assembly.
d. Finance charges and interest prior to and during construction and, if
deemed advisable by the State Treasurer, for a period not exceeding
three years after the estimated date of completion of construction.
e. The cost of bond insurance, investment contracts, credit enhancement
and liquidity facilities, interest rate swap agreements or other
derivative products, financial and legal consultants, and related costs
of bond and note issuance, and costs incurred by the State in
administering the bond issues, including costs of trustees, escrow
agents, arbitrage rebate liability consultants, securities disclosure
counsel or similar securities disclosure consultants, tax consultants
and financial advisors, to the extent and as determined by the State
Treasurer.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 29

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
f. The cost of reimbursing the State for any payments made for any cost
described in this subdivision.
g. Any other costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the purposes
of this subdivision.
Allocations in this section of proceeds of bonds to the costs of a project or
undertaking in each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in
sub-subdivisions c. through g. of this subdivision in connection with the
issuance of bonds for the project or undertaking.
(3) Credit facility agreement. – An agreement entered into by the State Treasurer
on behalf of the State with a bank, savings and loan association, or other
banking institution; an insurance company, reinsurance company, surety
company, or other insurance institution; a corporation, investment banking
firm, or other investment institution; or any financial institution or other
similar provider of a credit facility agreement, which provider may be located
within or without the United States of America, such agreement providing for
prompt payment of all or any part of the principal or purchase price (whether
at maturity, presentment or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration),
redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds or notes payable on
demand or tender by the owner, in consideration of the State agreeing to repay
the provider of the credit facility agreement in accordance with the terms and
provisions of such agreement.
(4) Notes. – Notes issued under this section.
(5) Par formula. – Any provision or formula adopted by the State to provide for
the adjustment, from time to time, of the interest rate or rates borne by any
bonds or notes, including the following:
a. A provision providing for such adjustment so that the purchase price
of such bonds or notes in the open market would be as close to par as
possible;
b. A provision providing for such adjustment based upon a percentage or
percentages of a LIBOR rate, a prime rate, or base rate, which
percentage or percentages may vary or be applied for different periods
of time; or
c. Such other provision as the State Treasurer may determine to be
consistent with this and will not materially and adversely affect the
financial position of the State and the marketing of bonds or notes at a
reasonable interest cost to the State.
(6) Public school capital outlay project. – A project for any of the following:
a. Construction of one or more new public school buildings.
b. Renovation of one or more existing public school buildings.
c. Construction, acquisition, and installation of technology infrastructure
for a public school building.
d. Acquisition and installation of equipment or fixtures to ensure
building security for a public school building.
e. Acquisition and installation of equipment for a public school building
that will be used for an instructional or related purpose.
f. Purchase of land necessary for construction to commence within 24
months of one or more public school buildings.
g. Other related capital outlay projects to provide facilities for individual
public schools that are used for instructional or related purposes.
The term does not include projects for facilities for centralized administration,
trailers, relocatable classrooms, or mobile classrooms.
Page 30 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) State. – The State of North Carolina.
SECTION 3.13.(c) Authorization of Bonds and Notes. – Subject to a favorable vote
of a majority of the qualified voters of the State who vote on the question of issuing bonds for
public school capital outlay projects in the election called and held as provided in this section,
the State Treasurer is hereby authorized, by and with the consent of the Council of State, to issue
and sell, at one time or from time to time, general obligation bonds of the State to be designated
"State of North Carolina Education Bonds," with any additional designations as may be
determined to indicate the issuance of bonds from time to time, or notes of the State as provided
in this section, in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding four billion dollars
($4,000,000,000) for the purpose of providing funds, with any other available funds, for the
purposes authorized in this section. In determining whether this limit has been reached, the
issuance of a note or bond to pay an outstanding note is not considered an issuance.
SECTION 3.13.(d) Use of Education Bond and Note Proceeds. –
(1) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection, four billion
dollars ($4,000,000,000) of the proceeds of education bonds and notes,
including premium thereon, if any, shall be used for the purpose of making
grants to counties for paying the cost of public school capital outlay projects,
repairs, and renovations. Proceeds of education bonds and notes shall be
distributed to public school units as if they were funds in the Needs-Based
Public School Capital Fund, except there shall be no matching requirements
imposed on the public school units.
Any additional monies that may be received by means of a grant or grants
from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or
from any other source to aid in financing the cost of public school capital
outlay projects authorized by this section may be placed by the State Treasurer
in the Education Bonds Fund or in a separate account or fund and shall be
disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without
regard to limitations imposed by this section.
(2) The State Board of Education shall also require counties to report annually on
the impact of funds provided under this section on the property tax rate for
that year. These reports shall be public documents and shall be furnished to
any citizen upon request.
(3) The General Assembly encourages, in projects for which bond proceeds are
allocated, consideration by counties and local school administrative units of
projects that primarily involve materially improving the energy efficiency of
the school facility.
SECTION 3.13.(e) Allocation and Tracking of Proceeds. –
(1) Education bonds. – The proceeds of education bonds and notes, including
premium thereon, if any, except the proceeds of bonds, the issuance of which
has been anticipated by bond anticipation notes or the proceeds of refunding
bonds or notes, shall be placed by the State Treasurer in a special fund to be
designated "Education Bonds Fund," which may include such appropriate
special accounts therein as may be determined by the State Treasurer and shall
be disbursed as provided in this section. Monies in the Education Bonds Fund
shall be allocated and expended as provided in this section.
Any additional monies that may be received by means of a grant or grants
from the United States of America or any agency or department thereof or
from any other source for deposit to the Education Bonds Fund may be placed
in the Education Bonds Fund or in a separate account or fund and shall be
disbursed, to the extent permitted by the terms of the grant or grants, without
regard to any limitations imposed by this section.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 31

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Monies in the Education Bonds Fund or any separate account established
under this section may be invested from time to time by the State Treasurer in
the same manner permitted for investment of monies belonging to the State or
held in the State treasury, except with respect to grant money to the extent
otherwise directed by the terms of the grant. Investment earnings, except
investment earnings with respect to grant monies to the extent otherwise
directed or restricted by the terms of the grant, may be (i) credited to the
Education Bonds Fund or (ii) used to satisfy compliance with applicable
requirements of the federal tax law.
The proceeds of education bonds and notes, including premium thereon,
if any, may be used with any other monies made available by the General
Assembly for funding the projects authorized by this section, including the
proceeds of any other State bond issues, whether heretofore made available or
that may be made available at the session of the General Assembly at which
this section is ratified or any subsequent sessions. The proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, shall be expended and
disbursed under the direction and supervision of the Director of the Budget.
The funds provided by this section shall be disbursed for the purposes
provided in this section upon warrants drawn on the State Treasurer by the
State Controller, which warrants shall not be drawn until requisition has been
approved by the Director of the Budget and which requisition shall be
approved only after full compliance with the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C
of the General Statutes.
(2) Tracking of bond proceeds. – The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's
designee is hereby authorized and directed to set up a comprehensive system
of tracking the proceeds of the education bonds and notes, including premium
thereon, if any, to the extent necessary to enable the State Treasurer or the
State Treasurer's designee to properly account for the use of such proceeds for
compliance with applicable requirements of the federal tax law or otherwise.
All recipients of such proceeds shall comply with any tracking system
implemented by the State Treasurer or the State Treasurer's designee for this
purpose. The State Treasurer may withhold proceeds if the recipient fails to
comply with this subdivision.
(3) Costs. – Allocations to the costs of a capital improvement or undertaking in
each case may include allocations to pay the costs set forth in sub-subdivisions
(b)(2)c. through (b)(2)g. of this section in connection with the issuance of
bonds for that capital improvement or undertaking.
SECTION 3.13.(f) Election. – The question of the issuance of the bonds authorized
by this section shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the time of the election in
2026 when voters of this State are given an opportunity to express their preference for the person
to be the presidential candidate of their political party. Any other primary, election, or
referendum, validly called or scheduled by law at the time the election on the bond question
provided for in this subsection is held, may be held as called or scheduled. Notice of the election
shall be given in the manner and at the times required by G.S. 163-33(8). The election and the
registration of voters therefor shall be held under and in accordance with the general laws of the
State. Absentee ballots shall be authorized in the election.
Ballots, voting systems authorized by Article 14A of Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes, or both may be used in accordance with rules prescribed by the State Board. The bond
question to be used in the ballots or voting systems shall be in substantially the following form:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Page 32 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The issuance of four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000) State of North Carolina
Education Bonds constituting general obligation bonds of the State secured by a pledge of the
faith and credit and taxing power of the State for the purpose of providing funds, with any other
available funds, to fund capital improvements, construction of new facilities, and the renovation
and rehabilitation of existing facilities for the State's kindergarten through grade 12 public
education system."
If a majority of those voting on a bond question in the election vote in favor of the
issuance of the bonds described in the question, those bonds may be issued as provided in this
section. If a majority of those voting on the bond question in the election do not vote in favor of
the issuance of the bonds described in the question, those bonds shall not be issued.
The results of the election shall be canvassed and declared as provided by law for
elections for State officers; the results of the election shall be certified by the State Board to the
Secretary of State in the manner and at the time provided by the general election laws of the
State.
SECTION 3.13.(g) Issuance of Bonds and Notes. –
(1) Terms and conditions. – Bonds or notes may bear such date or dates, may be
serial or term bonds or notes, or any combination thereof, may mature in such
amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding 40 years from their date or
dates, may be payable at such place or places, either within or without the
United States of America, in such coin or currency of the United States of
America as at the time of payment is legal tender for payment of public and
private debts, may bear interest at such rate or rates, which may vary from
time to time, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of
the State or otherwise as may be provided by the State, at such price or prices,
including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or notes, and under
such terms and conditions, all as may be determined by the State Treasurer by
and with the consent of the Council of State.
(2) Signatures; form and denomination; registration. – Bonds or notes may be
issued as certificated or uncertificated obligations. If issued as certificated
obligations, bonds or notes shall be signed on behalf of the State by the
Governor or shall bear the Governor's facsimile signature, shall be signed by
the State Treasurer or shall bear the State Treasurer's facsimile signature, and
shall bear the Great Seal of the State of North Carolina or a facsimile thereof
shall be impressed or imprinted thereon. If bonds or notes bear the facsimile
signatures of the Governor and the State Treasurer, the bonds or notes shall
also bear a manual signature, which may be that of a bond registrar, trustee,
paying agent, or designated assistant of the State Treasurer. Should any officer
whose signature or facsimile signature appears on bonds or notes cease to be
such officer before the delivery of the bonds or notes, the signature or
facsimile signature shall nevertheless have the same validity for all purposes
as if the officer had remained in office until delivery, and bonds or notes may
bear the facsimile signatures of persons who at the actual time of the execution
of the bonds or notes shall be the proper officers to sign any bond or note,
although at the date of the bond or note such persons may not have been such
officers. The form and denomination of bonds or notes, including the
provisions with respect to registration of the bonds or notes and any system
for their registration, shall be as the State Treasurer may determine in
conformity with this section; provided, however, that nothing in this section
shall prohibit the State Treasurer from proceeding, with respect to the issuance
and form of the bonds or notes, under the provisions of Chapter 159E of the
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 33

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
General Statutes, the Registered Public Obligations Act, as well as under this
section.
(3) Manner of sale; expenses. – Subject to the consent of the Council of State, the
State Treasurer shall determine the manner in which bonds or notes shall be
offered for sale, whether at public or private sale, whether within or without
the United States of America, and whether by publishing notices in certain
newspapers and financial journals, mailing notices, inviting bids by
correspondence, negotiating contracts of purchase, or otherwise, and the State
Treasurer is authorized to sell bonds or notes at one time or from time to time
at such rate or rates of interest, which may vary from time to time, and at such
price or prices, including a price less than the face amount of the bonds or the
notes, as the State Treasurer may determine. All expenses incurred in
preparation, sale, and issuance of bonds or notes shall be paid by the State
Treasurer from the proceeds of bonds or notes or other available monies.
(4) Notes; repayment. –
a. Subject to the consent of the Council of State, the State Treasurer is
hereby authorized to borrow money and to execute and issue notes of
the State for the same, but only in the following circumstances and
under the following conditions:
1. For anticipating the sale of bonds to the issuance of which the
Council of State shall have given consent if the State Treasurer
shall deem it advisable to postpone the issuance of the bonds.
2. For the payment of interest on or any installment of principal
of any bonds then outstanding if there shall not be sufficient
funds in the State treasury with which to pay the interest or
installment of principal as they respectively become due.
3. For the renewal of any loan evidenced by notes herein
authorized.
4. For the purposes authorized in this section.
5. For refunding bonds or notes as herein authorized.
b. Funds derived from the sale of bonds or notes may be used in the
payment of any bond anticipation notes issued under this section.
Funds provided by the General Assembly for the payment of interest
on or principal of bonds shall be used in paying the interest on or
principal of any notes and any renewals thereof, the proceeds of which
shall have been used in paying interest on or principal of the bonds.
(5) Refunding bonds and notes. – By and with the consent of the Council of State,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue and sell refunding bonds and notes
pursuant to the provisions of the State Refunding Bond Act for the purpose of
refunding bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section. The refunding bonds
and notes may be combined with any other issues of State bonds and notes
similarly secured.
(6) Tax exemption. – Bonds and notes shall be exempt from all State, county, and
municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special,
whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, excluding
inheritance and gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of bonds
and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on bonds and notes shall not be
subject to taxation as to income.
(7) Investment eligibility. – Bonds and notes are hereby made securities in which
all public officers, agencies, and public bodies of the State and its political
subdivisions; all insurance companies, trust companies, investment
Page 34 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
companies, banks, savings banks, savings and loan associations, credit unions,
pension or retirement funds, other financial institutions engaged in business
in the State; executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may
properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or
belonging to them. Bonds and notes are hereby made securities that may
properly and legally be deposited with and received by any officer or agency
of the State or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the
deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the State or any political subdivision
of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.
(8) Faith and credit. – The faith and credit and taxing power of the State are hereby
pledged for the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds and notes.
In addition to the State's right to amend any provision of this section to the
extent it does not impair any contractual right of a bond owner, the State
expressly reserves the right to amend any provision of this section with respect
to the making and repayment of loans, the disposition of any repayments of
loans, and any intercept provisions relating to the failure of a local government
unit to repay a loan, the bonds not being secured in any respect by loans, any
repayments thereof, or any intercept provisions with respect thereto.
SECTION 3.13.(h) Variable Interest Rates. – In fixing the details of bonds and notes,
the State Treasurer may provide that any of the bonds or notes may:
(1) Be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the
owner thereof, provided a credit facility agreement supports the bonds or
notes, unless the State Treasurer specifically determines that a credit facility
agreement is not required, upon a finding and determination by the State
Treasurer that the absence of a credit facility agreement will not materially or
adversely affect the financial position of the State and the marketing of the
bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the State;
(2) Be additionally supported by a credit facility agreement;
(3) Be made subject to redemption or a mandatory tender for purchase prior to
maturity;
(4) Bear interest at a rate or rates that may vary for such period or periods of time,
all as may be provided in the proceedings providing for the issuance of the
bonds or notes, including, without limitation, such variations as may be
permitted pursuant to a par formula; and
(5) Be made the subject of a remarketing agreement whereby an attempt is made
to remarket bonds or notes to new purchasers prior to their presentment for
payment to the provider of the credit facility agreement or to the State.
If the aggregate principal amount repayable by the State under a credit facility
agreement is in excess of the aggregate principal amount of bonds or notes secured by the credit
facility agreement, whether as a result of the inclusion in the credit facility agreement of a
provision for the payment of interest for a limited period of time or the payment of a redemption
premium or for any other reason, then the amount of authorized but unissued bonds or notes
during the term of such credit facility agreement shall not be less than the amount of such excess,
unless the payment of such excess is otherwise provided for by agreement of the State executed
by the State Treasurer.
SECTION 3.13.(i) Interpretation of Section. –
(1) Additional method. – The foregoing subsections of this section shall be
deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the
things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and
additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in
derogation of any powers now existing.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 35

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Statutory references. – References in this section to specific sections or
Chapters of the General Statutes or to specific acts are intended to be
references to these sections, Chapters, or acts as they may be amended from
time to time by the General Assembly.
(3) Broad construction. – This section, being necessary for the health, welfare,
and advancement of the people of the State, shall be broadly construed to
affect the purposes thereof.
(4) Inconsistent provisions. – Insofar as the provisions of this section are
inconsistent with the provisions of any general laws, or parts thereof, the
provisions of this section shall be controlling.
(5) Severability. – If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this section
are declared to be severable.
SECTION 3.13.(j) Other Agreements. – The State Treasurer may authorize, execute,
obtain, or otherwise provide for bond issuance, investment contracts, credit and liquidity
facilities, interest rate swap agreements and other derivative products, and any other related
instruments and matters the State Treasurer determines to be desirable in connection with the
issuance of bonds and notes.
SECTION 3.13.(k) Each entity, upon receiving the proceeds of education bonds and
notes, including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to and for purposes listed in subsection
(a) of this section, shall administer, supervise, and ensure that use of the proceeds comports with
those purposes. Each local school administrative unit, along with the corresponding board of
county commissioners, shall jointly submit to the State Board of Education a plan for the
distribution of the proceeds of education bonds and notes pursuant to this section. After the State
Board of Education determines that a local school administrative unit's planned expenditure of
part or all of the proceeds is within the purposes provided in this section, the State Board of
Education shall make the proceeds to which the plans apply available to the local school
administrative unit. Each local school administrative unit receiving the proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section shall report by January 1, 2027, and quarterly thereafter, to the State Board of Education
on the projects funded from education general obligation bonds authorized by subsection (a) of
this section, and the State Board of Education shall combine the reports and submit them to the
Joint Legislative Capital Oversight Committee, the House of Representatives Appropriations
Committee, and the Senate Committee on Appropriations/Base Budget. Each report shall include
the total project costs, the amount to be funded from the bonds, the expenditures to date from the
bonds and other sources, and the percentage of each project completed.
SECTION 3.13.(l) Projects funded in whole or in part with the proceeds of education
bonds and notes, including premium thereon, if any, issued pursuant to this section, and that
portion of funds estimated to be needed for escalation of costs shall remain with the Office of
State Budget and Management and shall be disbursed only for the following purposes:
(1) To address unforeseen contingencies related to the specific project for which
the funds were made available.
(2) To address inflation costs related to that specific project.
SECTION 3.13.(m) Any funds retained by the Office of State Budget and
Management pursuant to subsection (l) of this section at the time a project is completed shall be
retained by the Office of State Budget and Management. The Office of State Budget and
Management shall report on any funds retained pursuant to this subsection within 90 days of a
project's completion.
Page 36 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.13.(n) Any funds from the Education Bond expended for school
technology for public schools shall be reported to the State Board of Education and shall be
credited against the judgment in N.C. Sch. Bds. Ass'n. v. Moore, No. 98-CVS-14159 (N.C. Super.
Ct.).

DISADVANTAGED STUDENT SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING (DSSF)/AT-RISK
STUDENT SERVICES/ALTERNATIVE SCHOOLS
SECTION 3.14.(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the State Board of
Education shall transfer the At-Risk Student Services/Alternative Schools allotment into the
DSSF allotment, as established by G.S. 115C-472.24. The State Board of Education shall allocate
these funds to local school administrative units under a formula that provides that no local school
administrative unit receives a decrease in combined funding. Reallocated at-risk funding must be
counted as an independent supplement to existing DSSF funds.
SECTION 3.14.(b) G.S. 115C-472.24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-472.24. Disadvantaged Disadvantaged/at-risk student supplemental funding.
(a) To the extent funds are made available for this purpose, funds appropriated for
disadvantaged or at-risk student supplemental funding shall be used, consistent with the policies
and procedures adopted by the State Board of Education, only to do the following:
(1) Provide instructional positions or instructional support positions.
(2) Provide professional development.
(3) Provide intensive in-school or after-school remediation, or both.
(4) Purchase diagnostic software and progress-monitoring tools.
(5) Provide funds for teacher bonuses and supplements. The State Board of
Education shall set a maximum percentage of the funds that may be used for
this purpose.
(6) Provide funds for alternative learning and at-risk student programs in
accordance with G.S. 115C-12(24).
The State Board of Education may require local school administrative units receiving funding
under the Disadvantaged Student Supplemental Fund to purchase the Education Value-Added
Assessment System (EVAAS) in order to provide in-depth analysis of student performance and
help identify strategies for improving student achievement. This data shall be used exclusively
for instructional and curriculum decisions made in the best interest of children and for
professional development for their teachers and administrators.
…."
SECTION 3.14.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of nine hundred forty-four million three hundred thousand dollars
($944,300,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of
this section.

INCREASE FUNDING FOR CLASSROOM SUPPLIES
SECTION 3.15. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of ninety-six million seven hundred thousand dollars ($96,700,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the Classroom Materials/Instructional
Supplies/Equipment Allotment.

DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION TO STUDY WEIGHTED STUDENT
FUNDING MODEL
SECTION 3.16.(a) The Department of Public Instruction shall study methods of
implementing a weighted student funding formula that retains existing guaranteed position
allotments. The Department may contract with a third party to conduct this study. The
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 37

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Department shall report the Department's recommendations to implement such a model to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by March 15, 2027.
SECTION 3.16.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to perform the study required by this section.

PART IV. ASSESSMENT AND ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM THAT RELIABLY
ASSESSES MULTIPLE MEASURES OF STUDENT PERFORMANCE

ADJUST WEIGHTING BETWEEN PROFICIENCY AND GROWTH
SECTION 4.1.(a) G.S. 115C-83.15(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Calculation of the Overall School Performance Scores and Grades. – The State Board
of Education shall calculate the overall school performance score by adding the school
achievement score, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, and the school growth score, as
determined using EVAAS as provided in subsection (c) of this section, earned by a school. The
school achievement score shall account for eighty fifty-one percent (80%), (51%), and the school
growth score shall account for twenty forty-nine percent (20%) (49%) of the total sum. For all
schools, the total school performance score shall be converted to a 100-point scale and used to
determine an overall school performance grade. The overall school performance grade shall be
based on the following scale and shall not be modified to add any other designation related to
other performance measures, such as a "plus" or "minus":
…."
SECTION 4.1.(b) The Department of Public Instruction shall amend the State plan
under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the Every Student
Succeeds Act, to reflect the changes to achievement and growth score weighting in this section.
SECTION 4.1.(c) This section applies beginning with school performance scores
issued based on data from the 2026-2027 school year.

STUDY ON ADDITIONAL MEASURES IN THE SCHOOL ACCOUNTABILITY
SYSTEM
SECTION 4.2. The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Department
of Public Instruction, shall study methods of adding to the State school accountability system
indicators that provide information on the opportunity of students to access a sound basic
education. Additional indicators recommended shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of
the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the Every Student
Succeeds Act, and shall not replace indicators included in the State school accountability system
under Part 1B of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes. The State Board of Education
shall submit a report with its recommended changes regarding the school accountability system
to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on or before June 15, 2027.

PART V. ASSISTANCE AND TURNAROUND FUNCTION THAT PROVIDES
NECESSARY SUPPORT TO LOW-PERFORMING SCHOOLS AND
LOW-PERFORMING LOCAL SCHOOL ADMINISTRATIVE UNITS

DISTRICT AND REGIONAL SUPPORT MODEL
SECTION 5.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of nineteen million dollars ($19,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to continue to implement the District and Regional Support
model developed by the State Board of Education to support the improvement of low-performing
and high-poverty schools. Implementation shall (i) provide support in needed content areas and
instructional and leadership coaching and (ii) include direct, comprehensive, and progressive
Page 38 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
turnaround assistance to the State's chronically low-performing schools and low-performing
districts.

REVIEW AND UPDATE CURRICULUM ADOPTION PROCESSES
SECTION 5.2.(a) Before March 15, 2027, the State Board of Education shall review,
update, and strengthen the State-level process for reviewing and adopting core curriculum
resources. The State Board of Education shall provide statewide and regional support, resources,
and professional learning opportunities to assist schools and districts in selecting and successfully
employing high-quality, standards-aligned, culturally responsive, evidence-based resources and
practices to assist educators in applying innovative practices that promote continuous
improvement. No later than June 30, 2027, the Department of Public Instruction shall provide a
model implementation plan to each local school administrative unit.
SECTION 5.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this section.

SUPPORT FOR HIGH-POVERTY SCHOOLS
SECTION 5.3.(a) Article 13 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-209.2. Community schools support program.
(a) Program Established. – The Department of Public Instruction shall establish a
program (Program) to provide support to high-poverty schools that adopt a community school
model or other evidence-based models to address out-of-school barriers to learning.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Community school model. – The model following the Department of Public
Instruction's Whole School, Whole Community, Whole Child model based on
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's guidance.
(2) Evidence-based model. – Any model established using evidence-based
methods that, in the discretion of the State Board of Education, achieve the
goals set in the Whole School, Whole Community, Whole Child model.
(c) Participation. – The Department of Public Instruction shall disseminate an application
form for participation in the Program for the following school year no later than June 1 of each
year. No later than July 1, any school that uses a community school model or other
evidence-based model to address out-of-school barriers to learning may apply to participate in
the Program. No later than August 1 of each school year that funds are made available for this
purpose, the Department of Public Instruction shall select geographically and culturally diverse
schools from among the applicants for that school year to participate in the Program. Priority
shall be given to schools that have high rates of student poverty.
(d) Implementation. – Each participating local school administrative unit shall hire one
full-time school-based coordinator per participating school. The school-based coordinator shall
assess local needs and assets and organize the integration of social, academic, and health supports
in coordination with school support personnel. The school-based coordinator shall also assess the
school's access to technical assistance and professional support to effectively plan and implement
the community school model or other evidence-based model. No later than July 15 of each school
year that a school participates in the Program, the school-based coordinator shall submit to the
Department of Public Instruction a request for funds for goods or services beneficial to meeting
the goals of the community school model or other evidence-based model for the following school
year. No later than August 15 of each school year, the Department of Public Instruction shall
evaluate each funding request and allocate funds as it deems necessary.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 39

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Report. – No later than October 15 of each school year, the Department of Public
Instruction, in consultation with each school-based coordinator, shall provide a report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the following:
(1) The amount of funds requested by each school.
(2) The purposes of funds requested by each school.
(3) The amount of funds allocated to each school.
(4) The use of funds allocated to each school.
(5) Any effects of the model on school outcomes, including attendance rates,
academic outcomes, or any other measure the school-based coordinator or the
Department deems relevant.
(6) Any other information the Department deems relevant."
SECTION 5.3.(b) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Public Instruction the sum of sixty-five million five hundred thirteen thousand
six hundred twenty-one dollars ($65,513,621) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
implement the Program established by this section.
SECTION 5.3.(c) This section applies beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

SCHOOL MEAL DEBT REPORT
SECTION 5.4. Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-264.6. School meal debt report.
No later than October 15 of each year, the State Board of Education shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on unpaid meal charges in local school
administrative units. At a minimum, the report shall include the following information:
(1) The percentage of students in each grade level in each local school
administrative unit who carry unpaid meal debt.
(2) The total amount of funds received by each local school administrative unit
related to unpaid meal charges.
(3) Summaries of approaches adopted by each local school administrative unit
regarding unpaid meal charges.
(4) Options for a statewide policy on the uniform administration of unpaid meal
charges in local school administrative units."

CEP MEAL PROGRAM INCENTIVE
SECTION 5.5.(a) Part 2 of Article 17 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-264.15. CEP meal program supplement.
(a) Any public school unit or school within a public school unit that is operating a school
nutrition program that is eligible for the federal Community Eligibility Provision (CEP) program
shall participate in the CEP program to increase the number of students with access to healthy,
cost-free school breakfast and lunch. Schools participating in the CEP program shall have an
innovative breakfast option available where students have access to breakfast and are allowed to
consume breakfast in the classroom.
(b) To the extent funds are made available for the purpose, the Department of Public
Instruction shall issue State reimbursements to participating public school units and schools to
supplement federal reimbursements of school meals. State reimbursement shall equal the
difference between the federal free rate and the federal paid rate for the number of meals served
at the participating schools equal to a 0.2 multiplier of the Identified School Percentage (ISP) for
the participating schools. State and federal reimbursements shall not exceed one hundred percent
(100%) of the federal free rate of meals served. If funds provided for the purpose are insufficient,
the Department shall distribute available funds pro rata on the basis of average daily membership.
Page 40 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) No later than January 1 of each year, the Department shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee at least the following information:
(1) The number of schools participating in the CEP program and the number of
students served by use of the program.
(2) The amount of federal and State money participating public school units and
schools received.
(3) Any noted changes in student performance due to the increased availability of
nutrition services."
SECTION 5.5.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of ninety-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($92,500,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Department to provide State
reimbursements to schools participating in the CEP program pursuant to G.S. 115C-264.15, as
enacted by this act.
SECTION 5.5.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

PART VI. SYSTEM OF EARLY EDUCATION THAT PROVIDES ACCESS TO
HIGH-QUALITY PREKINDERGARTEN AND OTHER EARLY CHILDHOOD
LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES

EXPAND NC PREKINDERGARTEN (NC PRE-K) PROGRAM
SECTION 6.1.(a) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early
Education, the sum of three hundred thirty-three million four hundred thousand dollars
($333,400,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the purpose of expanding the
NC Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program for eligible children who are 4 years of age by
allocating funds for each of the following:
(1) Incrementally increase State funding for each NC Pre-K slot with the goal of
paying one hundred percent (100%) of the actual cost by the end of the
2027-2028 fiscal year.
(2) Gradually increase the number of eligible children able to be served in the NC
Pre-K program with the goal of reaching at least seventy-five percent (75%)
of eligible children in each county by the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year.
(3) Raise the rate for the county administrator to provide oversight, monitoring,
enrollment, and support to ten percent (10%) by the end of the 2026-2027
fiscal year.
(4) Phase extension of the NC Pre-K program year from 10 to 12 months in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 6.1.(b) Extend NC Pre-K Program Year to 12 Months. – Section 9D.1 of
S.L. 2023-134 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"SECTION 9D.1.(h) Extend NC Pre-K Program Year. – It is the intent of the General
Assembly to gradually extend the NC Pre-K program to cover 12 months of the program year
with full implementation statewide by the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year. To that end, the
Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division) shall develop and implement a
plan that (i) includes establishing a pilot program to extend the NC Pre-K program year from 10
to 12 months and (ii) is based on county capacity to implement the extension. The Division shall
select up to three counties to participate in the pilot program that includes, at a minimum,
representation from a private classroom setting, a public classroom setting that operates on a
year-round basis, and an underserved area. The Division shall submit a report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research
Division by December 31, 2027. The report shall include each of the following:
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 41

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The number of students participating in the pilot program.
(2) The number of students participating who are in an NC Pre-K classroom in a
child care center versus those in an NC Pre-K classroom in a public school.
(3) The number of schools and child care centers participating in the program,
including identifying those that are private and those that are public.
(4) The number of NC Pre-K classrooms participating in the program.
(5) The additional costs needed to implement the program.
(6) The challenges and successes of implementing the program in both NC Pre-K
classrooms in child care centers and NC Pre-K classrooms in public schools."
SECTION 6.1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division),
the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to increase State-level NC Pre-K staffing to manage the planned expansion of the NC Pre-K
program, provide policy development and program oversight, ensure program quality, and
manage any new, required studies.
SECTION 6.1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division),
the sum of forty-eight million four hundred thousand dollars ($48,400,000) in recurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide transportation to all participants enrolled in the NC Pre-K
program.

INCREASE HIGH-QUALITY EARLY LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES FOR
CHILDREN FROM BIRTH/INCREASE FUNDS FOR CHILD CARE SUBSIDY
SECTION 6.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division),
the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
increase funds for the child care subsidy program and provide for program improvements,
including, but not limited to, increasing compensation for the child care workforce and ensuring
that eligible families receive assistance through the elimination of waitlists.
SECTION 6.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division),
the sum of seventy-eight million seven hundred thousand dollars ($78,700,000) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to expand the Family Connects universal home visiting model
to local agencies statewide that choose to implement the program for their community through
local health departments or local Smart Start partnerships. Family Connects is an evidence-based
model that provides one to three home visits from a registered nurse to all families who have
newborns and live in a defined service area.
SECTION 6.2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division),
the sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
conduct a pilot program of a State model for high-quality early learning programs for eligible
children from birth to 3 years of age, for 1,000 children each year, with the intent to expand the
program to additional locations. The pilot program and any subsequent expansion of the pilot
program shall focus on high-poverty school districts across the State.

EXPAND AND IMPROVE ACCESS TO INDIVIDUALIZED EARLY INTERVENTION
SERVICES FOR ELIGIBLE CHILDREN/NC INFANT-TODDLER PROGRAM
SECTION 6.3.(a) Funds for NC Infant-Toddler Program. – There is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child and
Family Well-Being, Early Intervention Section, the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide funds for the North Carolina
Page 42 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Infant-Toddler Program, a program that provides support and services for families and their
children, from birth to 3 years of age, who have special needs. These funds shall be used to take
steps toward doing the following:
(1) Increasing State and local staffing in the provision of services to families with
infants and toddlers with developmental delays and established medical
conditions who are eligible for the NC Infant-Toddler Program.
(2) Expanding funding for interpreter services.
(3) Establishing a centralized provider network system.
(4) Providing professional development focused on early childhood mental
health.
(5) Addressing salary inequities affecting provider retention and recruitment.
SECTION 6.3.(b) Feasibility Study & Infrastructure Readiness
Assessment/Expansion of NC Infant-Toddler Program. – There is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child and Family
Well-Being, Early Intervention Section, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated as follows:
(1) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to conduct a feasibility study
to examine eligibility criteria and cost implications for expansion of the NC
Infant-Toddler Program.
(2) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to conduct a system and
infrastructure readiness assessment to determine areas of need and system
challenges that need to be addressed before expanding the NC Infant-Toddler
Program. The Division of Public Health shall solicit public input and feedback
on the plan developed pursuant to this subdivision.
SECTION 6.3.(c) Scale Up Early Intervention Services. – There is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child and
Family Well-Being, Early Intervention Section, the sum of one hundred sixty-two million five
hundred thousand dollars ($162,500,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
provide high-quality early intervention services and supports for up to an additional 30,000
children from birth to 3 years of age, who meet expanded eligibility criteria for the Infant and
Toddler Program implemented as a result of the feasibility study conducted pursuant to
subdivision (b)(1) of this section. The Early Intervention Section may use up to five percent (5%)
of these allocated funds to conduct a public awareness campaign regarding expansion of
eligibility for the NC Infant and Toddler Program, to increase efforts to identify children eligible
to receive services under this expanded program, and to create partnerships with family support
agencies.

INCREASE SMART START FUNDING
SECTION 6.4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
four hundred nineteen million six hundred thousand dollars ($419,600,000) in recurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to gradually increase funding for the North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc., (Smart Start), with the goal of fully funding Smart Start by the end of the
2027-2028 fiscal year. Funds allocated to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.,
pursuant to this section, shall be distributed to Smart Start local partnerships to improve statewide
early child system infrastructure and support a cohesive continuum of services for families and
children from birth through 5 years of age.

INCREASE EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR WORKFORCE
SECTION 6.5.(a) Funds for WAGE$ and AWARD$ Programs. – There is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 43

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of thirty-two million dollars ($32,000,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase funding for and expand participation
statewide in the Child Care WAGE$ program and the Infant-Toddler Educator AWARD$
program, both of which provide salary supplements for early childhood educators.
SECTION 6.5.(b) Recruitment Strategies and Professional Development. – There is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division
of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of seven million three hundred thousand
dollars ($7,300,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement strategies to
recruit early childhood educators and provide ongoing professional development, including
coaching, technical assistance, assistance with degree attainment, and licensure support.

FACILITATE RELIABLE ACCESS TO HIGH-QUALITY DATA SUPPORTING
EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION
SECTION 6.6.(a) Real-Time Workforce Data System. – There is appropriated from
the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to develop and implement a real-time workforce
data system that supports building a pipeline of early childhood educators.
SECTION 6.6.(b) Expand and Improve Current Early Childhood Data Systems. –
There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the sum of five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to expand and
improve the North Carolina Early Childhood Integrated Data System (NC ECIDS) and the North
Carolina Early Childhood Action plan data dashboards to track child outcomes and provide
access to State data for State and local users and researchers with the goal of connecting this data
to the NC Longitudinal Data System (NCLDS).
SECTION 6.6.(c) Build Local Capacity/Early Childhood Data. – There is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services
(Department), Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the sum of one
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
collaborate with the Divisions of Social Services and Public Health, as appropriate, in developing
and implementing a plan to provide technical assistance to build local capacity to use quality
early childhood data across child health, child welfare, and early childhood education for local
planning.
SECTION 6.6.(d) Real-Time Data Collection/Children Eligible for Early Childhood
Services. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and the sum of two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
develop and implement a real-time data collection and sharing process to identify children
eligible for early childhood programs, including the North Carolina Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K)
program and Early Intervention program, that allows for each of the following:
(1) The disaggregation along multiple variables, such as race, ethnicity, and
geography.
(2) The identification of the children most vulnerable to build a more equitable
early learning system.

PREKINDERGARTEN TO KINDERGARTEN TRANSITIONS
SECTION 6.7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
Page 44 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
incrementally scale up the Pre-K to K Transitions program to serve all districts.

COLLABORATIVE FAMILY ENGAGEMENT PLANS
SECTION 6.8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($320,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to provide ongoing support and technical assistance for establishing local
collaborative family engagement plans for birth through third grade.

REQUIRE LICENSURE FOR NC PRE-K LEAD TEACHERS
SECTION 6.9. By July 1, 2027, the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall implement a policy to require that all
NC Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) lead teachers hold an appropriate State teaching license as
specified by NC Pre-K policy. The policy shall also require that NC Pre-K lead teachers be paid
according to the State public school salary schedule by the 2027-2028 fiscal year.

PART VII. ALIGNMENT OF HIGH SCHOOL TO POSTSECONDARY AND CAREER
EXPECTATIONS FOR ALL STUDENTS

REVISE NCVPS FUNDING
SECTION 7.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of sixteen million seven hundred thousand dollars ($16,700,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to offset the costs for local administrative units
and charter schools to remove barriers to student participation in North Carolina Virtual Public
Schools. The funds shall be allocated with a priority to cover the costs of courses for students
enrolled in public schools located in low-wealth counties.

SCHOOL CALENDAR FLEXIBILITY/CC CALENDAR
SECTION 7.2.(a) G.S. 115C-84.2(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Opening and Closing Dates. – Local boards of education shall determine the dates of
opening and closing the public schools under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. Except for
year-round schools, the opening date for students shall be no earlier than the Monday closest to
August 26, and the closing date for students shall be no later than the Friday closest to June 11.
On a showing of good cause, the State Board of Education may waive the requirement that the
opening date for students be no earlier than the Monday closest to August 26 and may allow the
local board of education to set an opening date no earlier than the Monday closest to August 19,
to the extent that school calendars are able to provide sufficient days to accommodate anticipated
makeup days due to school closings. A local board may revise the scheduled closing date if
necessary in order to comply with the minimum requirements for instructional days or
instructional time. For purposes of this subsection, the term "good cause" means that schools in
any local school administrative unit in a county have been closed eight days per year during any
four of the last 10 years because of severe weather conditions, energy shortages, power failures,
or other emergency situations.
The required opening and closing dates under this subsection shall not apply to any school
that a local board designated as having a modified calendar for the 2003-2004 school year or to
any school that was part of a planned program in the 2003-2004 school year for a system of
modified calendar schools, so long as the school operates under a modified calendar.
Notwithstanding the required opening and closing dates under this subsection, a local board
of education may align the calendar of schools in the local school administrative unit with the
calendar of a community college serving the city or county in which the unit is located."
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 45

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 7.2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies
beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.

COLLEGE ADVISING CORPS/COLLEGE ADVISERS IN THE PUBLIC SCHOOLS
SECTION 7.3.(a) Purpose of the College Advising Corps Program. – From the funds
appropriated in subsection (b) of this section, the Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina shall make funds available to the National College Advising Corps, Inc., (CAC) to
support an expansion of the placement of college advisers in North Carolina public schools
through their program over a three-year period. CAC is a college access nonprofit organization
with the mission to increase the number of underrepresented, low-income, or first-generation
postsecondary degree or certificate students entering and completing their postsecondary
education at community colleges and universities. In furthering this mission, CAC operates an
innovative model of partnering with schools, communities, families, and postsecondary
institutions, including providing for a two-year service opportunity to recent college graduates
as near-peer college advisers working full time in the public schools, with an emphasis on
engaging college advisers who have similar backgrounds to the students the program seeks to
serve. Near-peer college advisers perform various services for those students that are key
components to the proven success of the program, including (i) attending postsecondary campus
visits, fairs, and workshops with students, (ii) assisting with registering for college entrance
exams, (iii) assisting with Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) registrations and
completions, (iv) identifying available scholarships, (v) assisting with postsecondary
applications, and (vi) engaging with parents.
SECTION 7.3.(b) Funds for the Program. – Due to the effectiveness of the
innovative model operated by CAC and the potential for significantly impacting the highest-need
students as described in subsection (a) of this section, the sum of three million dollars
($3,000,000) in recurring funds is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be provided to CAC for the
purpose of expanding the placement of college advisers in accordance with the requirements of
this section.
SECTION 7.3.(c) Use of Funds. – CAC shall focus the first two years of the
expansion of its program using the funds provided to it under this section by placing college
advisers in counties designated as tier one and tier two. For the third year of the expansion, CAC
shall use the funds provided to it to place college advisers in the remaining counties designated
as tier three in order to achieve placement of college advisers in all 100 counties of the State. In
addition, CAC shall select at least three additional postsecondary institutions to partner with in
order to increase the number of recent graduates working as near-peer college advisers to meet
the needs of the program expansion. Once CAC has reached the goal of placement of college
advisers in 100 counties, the funds provided to it for the program shall be used to continue the
mission of the program to increase access for North Carolina public school students to
postsecondary degree or certificate attainment at community colleges and universities.
SECTION 7.3.(d) Reporting Requirements. – CAC shall submit a report by June 1
of each year in which CAC spends State funds made available to it pursuant to this section to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division on the
progress of expanding the placement of college advisers, data on the effectiveness of the program
in increasing access for students to postsecondary education, and the use of State funds.

CAREER DEVELOPMENT COORDINATORS
SECTION 7.4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for a Career and Postsecondary Planning Director position in the
Department's career and technical education division to focus on career planning in grades five
Page 46 House Bill 1017-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
through 12. There is also appropriated the sum of eighty-seven million dollars ($87,000,000) in
recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the number of school-based career
development coordinators for grades six through 12.

FUNDS TO REMOVE BARRIERS FOR ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED
STUDENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE CAREER AND COLLEGE PROMISE
TRANSFER PATHWAY PROGRAM
SECTION 7.5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to fund additional costs for all economically disadvantaged students
enrolled in the Career and College Promise Transfer Pathway Program, including at least the full
costs of textbooks, transportation, meals on college campuses, fees, and technology. If these
funds are insufficient, the Department shall use additional unspent funds in the State Public
School Fund to fulfill this purpose.

PART VIII. MISCELLANEOUS

STATE BUDGET ACT APPLIES
SECTION 8.1. The provisions of the State Budget Act, Chapter 143C of the General
Statutes, are reenacted and shall remain in full force and effect and are incorporated in this act
by reference.

EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 8.2. The headings to the Parts, subparts, and sections of this act are a
convenience to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define
the text of this act, except for effective dates referring to a Part or subpart.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 8.3. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part so declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8.4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
House Bill 1017-First Edition Page 47